United States Department of Agriculture Forest Service Alaska Region P.O. Box 21628 Juneau, AK 99802-1628 File Code: 1570 Date: August 28, 2003 Mr. Mark Rorick Chair, Juneau Group of the Sierra Club 1055 Mendenhall Peninsula Road Juneau, AK 99801 Dear Mr. Rorick: Pursuant to 36 CFR 215.17, I have reviewed the administrative appeal record for the Cholmondeley Timber Sale Final Environmental Impact Statement (EIS) and Record of Decision (ROD). The ROD was signed by Thomas Pulcherz, Tongass Forest Supervisor. I have also considered the Appeal Reviewing Officer's (ARO) recommendation (enclosed) regarding the disposition of your appeal (Appeal No. 03-10-00-0007). The ARO recommended that the decision be affirmed and your requested relief be denied. DECISION I concur with the ARO's recommendation and I affirm the Forest Supervisor's decision. Your requested relief is denied. My decision incorporates, by reference, the entire administrative record, which includes the appeal and project planning records, and constitutes the final administrative determination of the Department of Agriculture (36 CFR 215.18)). The ROD may be implemented 15 days following the date of this decision (36 CFR 215.10(b)). Sincerely, /s/ Steven A. Brink STEVEN A. BRINK Appeal Deciding Officer Enclosures cc: Greenpeace Wilderness Society Center for Biological Diversity Sitka Conservation Society Tongass Forest Supervisor Craig District Ranger Tongass Appeal Coordinator Caring for the Land and Serving People Printed on Recycled Paper United States Department of Agriculture File Code: Subject: To: Forest Service Alaska Region P.O. Box 21628 Juneau, AK 99802-1628 1570 Date: August 28, 2003 Cholmondeley Record of Decision and Final Environmental Impact Statement Appeal Deciding Officer This is my recommendation, as Appeal Reviewing Officer, on the action you should take, as Appeal Deciding Officer, on the pending appeals of the Cholmondeley timber sale project. The following appeals were filed under 35 CFR 215: No. No. No. No. No. No. 03-10-00-0005, 03-10-00-0006, 03-10-00-0007, 03-10-00-0008, 03-10-00-0009, 03-10-00-0010, filed filed filed filed filed filed by by by by by by the Forest Conservation Council; the Alaska Forest Association; the Juneau Group of the Sierra Club; Earthjustice; the Southeast Alaska Conservation Council; and the Sitka Conservation Society. The decision being appealed is the decision by the Tongass Forest Supervisor, Tom Puchlerz, to authorize the sale of timber and the construction of roads in the Clover Bay and Sunny Cove areas on southeast Prince of Wales Island, approximately 25 air miles west of Ketchikan. The Selected Alternative, Alternative 5, with modifications, authorizes the harvest of approximately 1,225 acres (about 28.8 million board feet (MMBF) of timber (including right-of-way volume)) and the construction of about 21.1 miles of new road and two log transfer facilities (LTFs) to access the harvest units. The Forest Supervisor deferred a decision on the Saltery Cove portion of the project area while he continues to work with other agencies and the residents of the Cove towards resolving potential effects on drinking water sources. The Cholmondeley decision also includes a non-significant amendment to the Tongass Land and Resource Management Plan (TLMP), documenting the Forest Supervisor's decision to adjust the boundaries of two small old growth habitat reserves (OGRs) in Value Comparison Units (VCUs) 616 and 675, and one medium OGR in VCUs 616, 617, and 676. Background A Notice of Intent (NOI) to prepare an environmental impact statement (EIS) for the Cholmondeley project was published in the Federal Register on August 15, 1997. The Draft EIS was released for public comment on December 29, 2000, and on April 23, 2003, the Tongass Forest Supervisor signed the Record of Decision (ROD #1) for the project. The Forest Conservation Council, the Alaska Forest Association, the Juneau Group of the Sierra Club, Earthjustice (on behalf of various individuals and organizations), the Southeast Alaska Conservation Council, and the Sitka Conservation Society appealed the ROD. Greenpeace, the Wilderness Society, the Center for Biological Diversity, and the Sitka Conservation Society submitted interested party comments. Caring for the Land and Serving People Printed on Recycled Paper Appeal Deciding Officer 2 My review of these appeals was conducted pursuant to 36 CFR 215.19. The appeal and project records have been carefully reviewed in my consideration of the objections raised by the appellants and their requested relief. I have also considered the interested party comments. The Craig Ranger District prepared the enclosed indices of the documentation supporting the decision, which are keyed to specific issues raised by the appellants. The Craig District also submitted additional documentation in response to some of the appeal issues. Any documents not already included in the Cholmondeley appeal or project records are attached to this recommendation as exhibits. My recommendation hereby incorporates the entire administrative record for the project. The appellants list many interrelated issues in their appeals of the Cholmondeley timber sale project. Although I may not have listed each specific issue, I have considered all of the issues raised in the appeals and believe that they are adequately addressed in the following discussions. Appeal No. 03-10-00-0005, Forest Conservation Council: Issue 1. Whether the Forest Service used appropriate expertise in preparing the EIS and ROD for the Cholmondeley project. Appellants assert that the Forest Service should have included an economist on the interdisciplinary team (IDT) for the Cholmondeley project. Discussion The TLMP EIS (January 1997) includes a comprehensive analysis of the economic and social environment of Southeast Alaska, the Tongass National Forest, and the communities within these areas. This analysis was conducted by an IDT that included economists, social scientists, recreation planners, wildlife and fish biologists, as well as other disciplines. The Cholmondeley project was designed to implement the TLMP, and tiers to the analysis in the TLMP EIS. With regards to the Cholmondeley project specifically, the regulations implementing NEPA state: Environmental impact statements shall be prepared using an inter-disciplinary approach which will insure the integrated use of the natural and social sciences and the environmental design arts... The disciplines of the preparers shall be appropriate to the scope and issues identified in the scoping process. [40 CFR 1502.6]. The Forest Service Manual [FSM 1970.6] states, in part, that "the responsible line officer determines the scope, appropriate level, and complexity of economic and social analysis needed." The Cholmondeley project is a timber sale project, and `timber sale economics and supply' was identified as a significant issue during scoping for the project [EIS, p. 1-16]. The EIS discusses the timber economics of the project on pages 3-50 to 3-69. The EIS also discusses the potential effects of the project on the other significant issues identified during scoping, including the potential effects on the resources, residents, and visitors of Saltery Cove, Clover Bay, and Sunny Cove [pp. 3-6 to 3-50] and the potential effects on the roadless character of the project area [pp. 3-71 to 3-75]. Appeal Deciding Officer 3 The members of the IDT who conducted the Cholmondeley project analysis are listed on pages 4-1 to 4-5 of the EIS. This team included wildlife and fisheries biologists, silviculturists and transportation planners, an archaeologist, geologists and soil scientists, a botanist, a recreation forester and a landscape architect, a GIS computer specialist, and a writer-editor. Numerous other individuals also contributed to the analysis and field work conducted for the Cholmondeley project. In my opinion, this team represents an adequate range of appropriate expertise and experience in timber sale project planning. Issue 2. Whether the economic analysis conducted for the Cholmondeley project is adequate. Appellants assert that the Forest Service should have conducted an economic efficiency analysis for the Cholmondeley project, and should have considered the economic benefits of standing forests and the externalized costs of logging and roadbuilding (including the non-priced benefits and costs listed on pages 8-11 of their appeal). Appellants also assert that the Forest Service has failed to maximize net public benefits in its management of the Cholmondeley project area. Discussion The balance of resource use necessary to maintain a viable economic and social environment is not established at any one level in forest planning. Rather, the process begins with long-range planning at the national level, and continues down through the regional and forest levels to the project planning level. The Cholmondeley EIS is a project level analysis; its scope is confined to the potential effects of the project on the issues identified during scoping for the project. It does not attempt to address decisions made at higher levels of planning. It does, however, implement direction provided at those levels. Forest Service regulations at 36 CFR 219.4 describe Forest Service planning levels and their relationships. Planning begins at the national level through the RPA program, which establishes long-term strategic goals for the multiple-use management of National Forest System (NFS) lands but does not make specific decisions regarding the management of these lands. Section 6 of the RPA requires the Forest Service to develop, maintain, and, as appropriate, revise land and resource management plans for units of the NFS as part of the RPA program. The TLMP is the Forest Plan for the Tongass National Forest, and was developed, in part, to respond to the strategic goals identified in the RPA program. These goals include 1) enhancing recreation, wildlife, and fisheries resources; 2) ensuring environmentally acceptable commodity production; 3) improving scientific knowledge about natural resources; and 4) responding to global resource issues [1997 TLMP Record of Decision, p. 28]. In terms of planning for the Tongass National Forest, the TLMP addressed this issue when it allocated the Forest to a variety of land use designations (LUDs), established goals and objectives for the management of the Forest, and identified the desired future condition of the lands within the various LUDs. For the Cholmondeley project area specifically, the TLMP allocated approximately 38 percent of the NFS lands within the project area to the timber production LUD. These lands are to be managed for the production of sawtimber and other wood products on an even-flow, long-term sustained yield basis. The TLMP allocated an additional 12 percent of the land within the project area to the modified landscape LUD. Appeal Deciding Officer 4 The desired future condition for these lands states, in part, that they will produce a yield of timber that contributes to the Forest-wide sustained yield. The remaining NFS lands within the project area are allocated to the semi-remote recreation and old growth habitat LUDs, which generally does not permit timber harvest [Cholmondeley EIS, p. 1-9]. In addition to land use allocations, the TLMP established Forest-wide standards and guidelines for the protection and management of the different forest resources. The TLMP EIS includes an analysis of the economic and social environment in Southeast Alaska, the Tongass National Forest, and the communities within these areas. This analysis was conducted by an IDT that included economists, social scientists, recreation planners, wildlife and fish biologists, as well as other disciplines. The Economic and Social Environment section of the TLMP EIS includes detailed information on industries directly dependent upon the Forest, including the timber, recreation and tourism, salmon harvesting and processing, and mining industries. This information includes, among other things, 1995 employment data [p. 3-443, Table 3-131], baseline employment levels projected for the year 2000 [p. 3-472, Table 3-139], and estimated employment and income levels under each alternative considered in the EIS [p. 3-473, Table 3-140; p. 3-474, Table 3-141]. The TLMP EIS also discusses the potential effects of each alternative on various communities within the Tongass [pp. 3-523 to 3-685]. The analysis conducted for the TLMP EIS concluded that only two employment sectors - timber and recreation/tourism - would show direct or indirect effects from Tongass National Forest management over the next decade [TLMP EIS, p. 2-67]. Based on this analysis, the EIS concluded that employment in the recreation and tourism industry was expected to increase moderately, and about the same amount, under all alternatives during the first decade, while timber industry employment was expected to decrease under the majority of alternatives, including Alternative 11 (which is the basis of the TLMP) [TLMP EIS, p. 2-67]. With regards to the Cholmondeley project specifically, the Forest Service Manual [FSM 1970.6] states, in part, that "the responsible line officer determines the scope, appropriate level, and complexity of economic and social analysis needed." The Cholmondeley project is a timber sale project, and was proposed to respond to the goals and objectives identified by TLMP for the timber resource and to help move the project area towards the desired future condition identified in TLMP for the lands within the timber production and modified landscape LUDs. The Cholmondeley EIS discusses the timber economics of the project on pages 3-50 to 3-69. The EIS also discusses the potential effects of the project on other resources, including water resources, fisheries and wildlife, recreation and scenery, heritage resources and subsistence, soil productivity and karst, wetlands and floodplains, and the roadless character of the McKenzie Roadless Area [see Chapter 3 of the EIS]. Appellants assert that the economic analysis conducted for the Cholmondeley EIS is inadequate because the Forest Service failed to quantify the non-market values and costs associated with the project. It is important to note here that appellants appear to confuse financial efficiency analyses, which are required for every timber sale project, with economic efficiency analyses, which are not required [see Forest Service Handbook (FSH) 2409.18, 13]. Financial efficiency analyses compare the estimated Forest Service direct expenditures with the estimated financial revenues of proposed timber sales [see pp. 3-58 to 3-69 of the Cholmondeley EIS for a discussion of the timber sale costs and revenues associated with the Cholmondeley project Appeal Deciding Officer 5 alternatives]. Appellants appear to suggest that the Forest Service Handbook requires a quantitative monetary analysis of all costs and benefits for all timber sale projects. However, the Handbook does not require the agency to quantify, in monetary terms, all of the costs and benefits associated with non-market impacts, and in fact, under most planning and project conditions, all costs and benefits cannot be monetarily valued. While the Forest Service is not required to quantify the non-market benefits and costs associated with every timber sale, it is required to "insure that unquantified environmental amenities and values [are] given appropriate consideration in decisionmaking along with economic and technical considerations" [42 USC 4332(2)(B)]. As stated above, the Cholmondeley EIS analyzed the potential effects of the project on "unquantified environmental amenities and values," such as water resources, fisheries and wildlife, recreation and scenery, heritage resources and subsistence, soil productivity and karst, wetlands and floodplains, and the roadless character of the McKenzie Roadless Area [see Chapter 3 of the EIS]. In my opinion, the analysis of the project's potential effects on these non-market values is reasonable, and consistent with Forest Service Manual and Handbook guidance regarding social and economic analyses. With regards to appellants' assertions relating to net public benefits, appellants confuse program level analysis and project level analysis. An analysis of net public benefits is appropriate at the program level in forest planning. Appellants cite sections of the forest planning regulations at 36 CFR Part 219. These regulations set forth a process for developing, adopting, and revising land and resource management plans as required by the RPA; they do not apply to individual timber sales. The TLMP reflects an alternative that was chosen to manage the Tongass National Forest for the highest net public benefit. The Cholmondeley project was prepared, in part, to implement the TLMP, and was designed to be fully consistent with the applicable management direction and standards and guidelines of the TLMP. See Issues 1 and 3 of the Sierra Club appeal, below, for further discussion of the adequacy of the social and economic analyses conducted for the Cholmondeley project. Appeal No. 03-10-00-0006, Alaska Forest Association: Based on an agreement reached with the Acting Tongass Forest Supervisor during informal appeal resolution meetings, the Alaska Forest Association withdrew their appeal [see Exhibit A]. Therefore, this recommendation does not address the issues raised in their appeal. Appeal No. 03-10-00-0007, Sierra Club: Issue 1. Whether the Cholmondeley EIS properly accounts for the cedar component of the timber sale. Appellants assert that the Cholmondeley EIS fails to adequately analyze the issues associated with the high cedar component of the sale, particularly with regards to (1) sale economics, and (2) species composition and diversity. Appeal Deciding Officer Discussion 6 Appellants are correct in stating that the Cholmondeley project area contains a higher-thanaverage amount of the cedar component. This is due to the greater amount of wetter and lower quality growing sites, where cedar is more competitive. As stated in the EIS, the Alaska Region "Superstand" program calculated that approximately 60 percent of the volume proposed for harvest would be from the cedar component of the Forest [EIS, p. 3-87]. This program assumed net volumes per acre and even-aged management with no reserve trees left. After taking into account the silvicultural prescriptions for each unit, the cedar component of the Cholmondeley alternatives ranges from 45 to 49 percent [derived from Table 3-9 in the Cholmondeley EIS]. Appellants assert that the employment estimates displayed in the EIS should have taken into account the fact that 100 percent of Alaska yellow cedar (AYC) is typically exported, and that 90 percent of the western red cedar (WRC) harvested over the last 10 years has been exported. This is true. Raw log exports are generally the most profitable market option for Southeast Alaskan timber. As a result, the vast majority of timber that is not prohibited from log export leaves the Region in raw log form. While log exports of western hemlock and Sitka spruce are prohibited, the export of AYC in raw log form is currently allowed. The export of WRC is prohibited unless potential exporters can demonstrate that their volume is in excess of current demand by local processors. While close to 90 percent of WRC was exported throughout much of the 1990's, this was largely the result of the Ketchikan Pulp Company long-term contract. In recent years, the share of log exports for WRC has declined. For the 1998-2002 time period, log exports accounted for about 58 percent of WRC harvest. The Forest Service estimates that this ratio will fall to about 50 percent for current and future harvests [Cholmondeley EIS, p. 3-86]. In contrast to locally processed timber, log exports do not generate sawmill employment. The main employment and earnings estimates in the Cholmondeley EIS [Table 3-7] and ROD [NEAT analysis displayed in Table R-1] do not account for this fact. These estimates follow practices common to other timber sale projects on the Tongass, but because of the exceptionally large component of cedar in the Cholmondeley sale, adjustments to account for the cedar export's impact on employment are needed. My staff estimated direct employment based on the CCF (100 cubic feet) volumes in Table 3-9 of the Cholmondeley EIS and on employment per MMBF coefficients from the TLMP Supplemental EIS (TLMP SEIS). This process involved the following steps: 1) Total sale volume multiplied by 0.000975 jobs/CCF (1.95 jobs/MMBF) to derive expected logging employment (jobs are job-years, meaning one year of employment). 2) Total sale volume minus AYC volume multiplied by 0.001665 jobs/CCF (3.33 jobs/MMBF) to derive expected sawmill employment. 3) These two employment estimates are then summed to derive total expected direct employment by alternative. 4) Two other estimates are provided to account for alternate assumptions about WRC log exports and utilization of lower grade material (discussed below). Appeal Deciding Officer The following table displays these calculations, along with the original estimates for the Cholmondeley project alternatives presented in Table R-1 of the ROD. Direct Employment Calculation A. Total Employment from NEAT (Table R-1) B. Sale Volume (CCF) C. Logging Employment D. WRC Volume ROD 1 145 54,812 53 17,977 Alt 2 172 65,064 63 21,449 Alt 3 176 66,760 65 22,105 Alt 4 119 45,226 44 14,481 Alt 5 197 74,521 73 24,639 Alt 6 187 70,988 69 23,464 Alt 7 40 15,141 15 5,115 7 E. AYC Volume (export) 7,769 9,306 9,803 6,029 10,867 10,248 2,307 F. Sawmill Employment w/AYC Log Export 78 93 95 65 106 101 21 132 156 160 109 179 170 36 G. Total Employment w/ AYC Log Export 117 138 142 97 158 151 32 H. Total w/ 50% WRC Log Export 85 101 103 71 115 110 23 I. Total Cedar Export & Higher Util. Stand A is the estimate from Table R-1 in the ROD and does not incorporate cedar exports. B is the total sale volume from Table 3-9 in EIS. C = B x 0.000975 jobs/CCF (logging employment coefficient from TLMP SEIS and used in current EIS). D = WRC CCF volume from Table 3-9 in EIS. E = AYC CCF volume from Table 3-9 in EIS. F = (B � E) x 0.001665 jobs/CCF (sawmill employment coefficient from TLMP SEIS and used in current EIS). G = C + F. H is the employment estimate assuming 50% of WRC is exported in log form. I is the employment estimate assuming 100% WRC export and optional removal to a 10 inch top. As indicated by this table, the estimates presented in line G are approximately 9 percent less than those identified in Table R-1 of the ROD. The alternate estimates in lines H and I are about 19 percent and 41 percent less, respectively, than those displayed in Table R-1 of the ROD. Given the current deficit appraisal for the Cholmondeley sale and the probability that at least some of the WRC volume will be exported in round log form, the employment estimates in line G should be viewed as an upper limit for the amount of employment that can be expected from the sale. Appellants assert that the discussion on page 3-55 of the EIS does not differentiate between WRC and AYC. This is true. Under the 50 percent "cedar" export assumption, the EIS concludes that 23 percent of the total volume will be exported as round logs, resulting in a 23 percent reduction in total employment. This is in error for two reasons: 1) the estimate does not differentiate between WRC and AYC (the latter of which would be 100 percent round log export); and 2) the 23 percent reduction should only apply to sawmill employment, not total employment. Appeal Deciding Officer 8 Appellants also assert that the employment estimate stated on page R-17 of the ROD does not take into account the Saltery Cove volume, which was deferred in the Forest Supervisor's decision. This is true. While this page of the ROD indicates that a decision on the Saltery Cove portion of the project has been deferred and that the Selected Alternative authorizes the harvest of 28.8 MMBF (verses 35.6 MMBF in Alternative 5), it does not make the associated adjustment in the employment estimate. Rather, it cites the EIS's estimate of 188 jobs if all of the Alternative 5 volume was harvested. Because it includes the Saltery Cove volume, this estimate is an error. As indicated in the table above, the ROD volume (Alternative 5 minus the Saltery Cove volume) was estimated to provide 145 jobs. This number is displayed in Table R-1 of the ROD, as discussed above. While the employment estimates provided in the Cholmondeley EIS and ROD do not take into account the cedar component of the sale that may be exported, and while the ROD includes inaccurate information on the estimated employment resulting from the harvest volume authorized in the Selected Alternative, these adjustments do not affect the relative ranking of the alternatives the Forest Supervisor considered. Therefore, in my opinion these changes would probably not have led to the selection of a different alternative or otherwise affected the Forest Supervisor's decision. With regards to appellants' assertions relating to species composition and diversity, the EIS discusses the higher-than-average cedar component of the Cholmondeley project area, which is due to the greater amount of wetter and lower quality growing sites where cedar is more competitive [EIS, p. 3-87]. As indicated in the EIS, the Forest Plan states that silvicultural prescriptions will consider regeneration and maintenance of minor species, of which cedar is considered [Id.; see also TLMP, p. 4-94]. Species composition can be enhanced and maintained in several ways. Harvest prescriptions and post-sale activities planned for the Cholmondeley harvest units are designed to achieve species composition objectives. Leaving advanced regeneration, fill-in planting, and precommercial thinning favoring particular species will all be used to maintain the cedar component in the project area. Reserve trees and trees left near unit boundary locations in nearly all of the harvest units will contain and target cedar to be left as seed tree sources [EIS, pp. 3-86 to 3-87; see also ROD unit cards]. Based on the pre-sale preparation for cedar reserve trees and the post-sale treatment activities planned for the Cholmondeley harvest units, the cedar component of the project area is expected to be maintained and the timber harvest authorized in the ROD should have no adverse effect on the quantity or composition of cedar in the future. In my opinion, the analysis in the Cholmondeley EIS with respect to this issue is adequate. Issue 2. Whether the Cholmondeley project is needed to meet market demand. Appellants assert that the Forest Service's interpretation of the Tongass Timber Reform Act's (TTRA) "market demand" provision and its analysis of the current market demand are flawed, and that the Cholmondeley project is not necessary. Appeal Deciding Officer Discussion 9 In large part, appellants' assertions regarding the Forest Service's analysis of market demand and its reliance on the TTRA market demand provisions for the purpose and need for the Cholmondeley sale are outside the scope of a project level EIS. The Cholmondeley project is designed to contribute to the harvest levels stipulated in TLMP, which were derived, in part, from market demand calculations undertaken as part of that planning effort. Section 101 of the Tongass Timber Reform Act requires the Forest Service to seek to provide a supply of timber from the Tongass National Forest which 1) meets the annual market demand for timber; and 2) meets the market demand for the planning cycle, consistent with providing for the multiple use and sustained yield of all renewable forest resources. Given the lengthy time periods involved in clearing timber volume through the NEPA and appeals and litigation processes and fluctuating market conditions, it is not possible to precisely identify the volume necessary to meet market demand for timber. However, clearing a timber sale project through the NEPA process is an important step in the process the Alaska Region uses to comply with this mandate. The NEPA process can often take from one to four years and ends when a NEPA decision is made, usually in the form of a Decision Notice or ROD. Once a timber project has been cleared through the NEPA process, it is still subject to the administrative appeals process and to litigation. This process can take as little as 60 days, if no appeals are filed, and up to four years if litigated. As a result, it can take several years for the timber volume cleared in a NEPA document to be available for sale. Whether the timber volume cleared in a NEPA document is actually sold and harvested depends on market conditions and other factors important to the overall management of the Tongass National Forest. The process the Alaska Region follows in actually scheduling timber volume for sale is outlined in the document entitled "Evaluating the Demand for Tongass Timber: Using Adaptive Management to Implement Sec. 101 of the 1990 Tongass Timber Reform Act," which is available on the Region's internet site [www.fs.fed.us/r10]. With regards to the Cholmondeley project specifically, Appendix A of the EIS discusses how the Cholmondeley project fits into the Tongass timber program and why it couldn't simply occur somewhere else on the Forest [EIS, p. A-15]. Appellants question the ability of the project area to produce economic timber sales, and it is true that the financial efficiency analysis conducted for the Cholmondeley project alternatives indicates that they all have deficit expected sale values at this time [EIS, p. 3-59]. However, the EIS discusses opportunities to improve the economics of the Cholmondeley offerings [pp. 3-61 to 3-62], and explains that offerings will only be sold if a profit can be realized [EIS, Appendix B, p. B-39]. As stated above, clearing a project through the NEPA process is an important step in the process the Alaska Region uses to comply with Section 101 of the TTRA; thus, the Forest Supervisor's conclusion that the Cholmondeley project is a necessary component of the Tongass timber program is reasonable. Appeal Deciding Officer 10 Issue 3. Whether the Cholmondeley EIS adequately analyzes the project's potential effects on the Clover Bay Lodge. Appellants assert that the Cholmondeley EIS does not disclose the extent to which the Clover Bay Lodge contributes to the area's economy, and does not adequately analyze the potential effects on the Lodge and the subsequent effects on the area's economy. Discussion The potential effects of the Cholmondeley project on Clover Bay and its resources, residents, and visitors are discussed on pages 3-32 to 3-42 of the EIS. Appellants are correct in stating that the EIS does not disclose the extent to which the Clover Bay Lodge contributes to the area's economy, and it is also true that the EIS does not quantify the potential effects of the project's alternatives on the Lodge or the area's economy. However, there is information in the Social and Economic Report conducted for the Cholmondeley project that indicates that the Clover Bay Lodge's contributions to the local economy, along with the potential effects of the project's alternatives on those contributions, have been considered. The Clover Bay Lodge is moored in Clover Bay from June 1 through August 15 each year, and is moved to Ketchikan for the remainder of the year. Its owners are Ketchikan residents, and they have reported that they have hosted about 4,800 visitors (approximately 250 to 300 per year) in the 16 years the Lodge has been in existence [EIS, p. 3-35]. Fishing revenues have recently produced between $350 and $500 each day for boat rental, and the annual gross income for the Lodge has been between $350,000 and $400,000 per year [see decision document #24, Social and Economic Report, p. 2]. The Lodge employs the four owners and up to an additional 7 seasonal workers [Id.]. Saltwater fishing in the main activity for Lodge visitors; other activities include the viewing of marine mammals, eagles, and bears that are relatively close to the Lodge in Clover Bay. The Lodge is marketed for a wilderness/ecosystem/wildlife experience, and Lodge owners have stated that 85 percent of the clients are repeat customers and would generally be opposed to any proposed activity that would leave its footprint on the land and change the pristine character of the area [Id.]. The Cholmondeley EIS discusses the potential effects of the project on the Clover Bay Lodge on pages 3-35 to 3-38. These effects are discussed in a largely qualitative manner, but that is not surprising given the nature of the business and the fact that it is difficult to quantify the effects on lodge businesses. The EIS acknowledges that the proposed logging activity "may have an impact on lodge clients," but states "that it is impossible to say that the impact will be positive or negative to all" [EIS, p. 3-35]. The EIS goes on to discuss an informal phone survey undertaken as part of the Cholmondeley planning effort. According to the EIS, this study indicates that lodge owners who have had timber harvest in their view shed or where clients' activities occur have generally reported that harvest has not had an effect on the economics of their business [Id.]. The results of this survey are included as an addendum to the Social and Economic Report conducted for the project Appeal Deciding Officer 11 [decision document #24]. While this study indicates a good-faith effort on the part of the IDT to determine the potential effects on the lodges affected by the Cholmondeley project, I agree with appellants that the best information on the potential effects of the project on the Clover Bay Lodge comes from the Lodge owners themselves. This information is disclosed in the Cholmondeley EIS and in additional documentation in the project record. As stated in the EIS, the owners of the Clover Bay Lodge have indicated that any change in the natural setting may negatively affect their clientele by impacting their "wilderness experience" [EIS, p. 3-32]. The EIS acknowledges that as a result of the proposed timber harvest and LTF operations, "lodge occupancy rates may decrease or the type of clientele may shift" and that information provided by the Lodge's owners "indicates a high risk of losing recreation industry jobs" [EIS, p. 3-37]. As indicated in the Social and Economic Report completed for the Cholmondeley project, the risk to the economic opportunities provided by the Lodge is based on the potential effects to the workforce due to the estimated rates of return customers, and "high risk" means that up to 80 percent of the workforce may be at risk [decision document #24, p. 6]. The effects of the project on lodge clients are based on the length of sale activities and the actual activity clients may witness [EIS, p. 3-36]. As indicated in the EIS, logging activities associated with the Cholmondeley project are expected to occur over a period of two to four seasons, and effects include the noise and visual effects of the construction and use of the LTF and roads and the visual effects of the harvest units north of Monie Lake, which would be visible from Clarence Strait [EIS, pp. 3-36 to 3-38]. However, the EIS and ROD also discuss specific measures that are intended to help mitigate the effects on Clover Bay, including locating the operating area in a way that will create a screen of at least 60 to 75 feet ranging up to about 150 feet that will hide much of this development from the Bay; using a 60-foot vegetative buffer to screen the short road from the ramp to the operating area; moving the northern boundary of one unit to minimize visibility of the unit from the Bay; using a low angle ramp LTF style, which has the least visual impact; and implementing a mitigation measure that would limit activities near Clover Bay between June 1 and August 15 if possible [EIS, pp. 3-33 to 3-38; ROD, p. R-14]. In my opinion, the EIS did consider and disclose the potential effects of the Cholmondeley project alternatives on the Clover Bay Lodge. While these effects may not have been quantified to the extent appellants assert they should have been, the EIS and project record indicate that the Forest Supervisor did consider the annual income of the Lodge and the estimated effects on the workforce associated with the Lodge, along with other potential effects on the clientele of the Lodge and the resources of Clover Bay. In my opinion, the analysis in the EIS with respect to the potential effects on the resources, residents, and visitors of Clover Bay is adequate. Issue 4. Whether the Forest Service erred in its development and analysis of Alternative 6. Appellants assert that the Island Point LTF site (included in Alternative 6) was improperly dismissed as a viable alternative due to several errors in its cost analysis. Appellants further assert that the Forest Service should have developed an alternative using the same road route as Alternative 5 to access the Island Point LTF site. Appellants assert that there is no rationale provided for the new road alignment, which required helicopter yarding and construction of a 60-foot bridge that were not necessary with the road route in Alternative 5. Appeal Deciding Officer Discussion 12 The regulations implementing NEPA at 40 CFR 1503.4(a) discuss the possible responses to public comments received on a Draft EIS. One possible response is to develop and evaluate alternatives not previously given serious consideration by the agency [40 CFR 1503.4(a)(2)]. Consistent with these regulations, and in response to comments regarding the potential effects of the Cholmondeley project on the resources of Clover Bay and the viability of a LTF at Island Point, the Cholmondeley IDT developed Alternative 6 between the Draft and Final EISs. This alternative is similar to Alternative 5, except it proposed a new LTF west of Island Point to service the Dr. Point and North Monie offering areas. This eliminated the LTF in Clover Bay and the road from the Bay south of unit 616-007; dropped the northern portion of unit 616-010 in response to visual concerns; and required a new road location for the road originating from the Island Point LTF site, resulting in the conversion of units 616-022, 616-023, 616-024, and 616-123 from cable yarding to helicopter logging. Appellants question the new road alignment proposed in this alternative, which required the conversion of these four units to helicopter logging and the construction of a 60-foot bridge not included in Alternative 5. Appellants also question the cost analysis conducted for Alternative 6. Chapter 2 of the EIS discusses the alternatives that were developed for the Cholmondeley project, including Alternative 6. In its description of Alternative 6 and its discussion of how it responds to the issues, the EIS states "extending from this LTF will be a road running along the lower slopes of the ridge on which many of the above units are located" [EIS, p. 2-25]. While the EIS does not elaborate, this ridge is the reason that the road to Island Point had to be realigned to the east rather than just being extended from the end of the Alternative 5 road system. Exhibit B to this letter contains a map that illustrates the proposed road alignments for Alternatives 5 and 6, along with the topography of the area. As is evident on this map, accessing the Island Point LTF site from the end of the road in Alternative 5 is impracticable due to the elevation differences. In order to construct the road to Island Point, the road had to drop below the ridge east of Unit 616-023 and run roughly parallel to the Alternative 5 road. Appellants correctly point out that the new road alignment requires the conversion of four units to helicopter logging. The record indicates that the Cholmondeley IDT considered parallel road systems so that these units could be conventionally logged and then trucked to the Island Point LTF. However, this option was not included in Alternative 6 as the IDT wanted to avoid the resource impacts resulting from parallel roads in the area and there was not a significant difference in the costs associated with this option [EIS, Appendix E, pp. E-15 to E-16]. Some appellants question why the 60-foot bridge was required in Alternative 6, and why the cost per mile of road constructed was higher for Alternative 6 than Alternative 5 ($180,000 per mile verses $150,000 per mile). As discussed in the Addendum to the Cholmondeley LTF Reconnaissance Report, the road proposed in Alternative 6 would have required the construction of one 60-foot bridge and three Class I stream crossings [EIS, Appendix E, p. E-15]. While this section of the road proposed for Alternative 6 crossed most of the same streams as the road in Alternative 5, it did so at a much lower elevation closer to fish habitat and other resource concerns and where stream size and topography are very different. As a result of this, the bridge required in Alternative 6, which would have crossed the same stream as a 36-inch Appeal Deciding Officer 13 diameter culvert in Alternative 5, was necessary. This section of the proposed road also required three Class I stream crossings which required fish passage and timing windows [EIS, Appendix E, p. E-1]. That many stream crossings with a typical fish timing window of three months would have required two construction seasons, meaning additional mobilization costs, or would have required even more costly alternatives to crossing the streams. So while the construction difficulty was considered the same for the two different road locations, the additional cost of the Class I stream crossings at the lower elevation made the most difference in the cost per mile. Some appellants also question the Forest Supervisor's conclusion that the Clover Bay site was the best site for the LTF. Appellants correctly point out that the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service's (USFWS) findings on the Island Point LTF concluded that it "appears to offer significant advantages over the Clover Bay site... Both biological diversity and productivity appeared to be lower at the Island Point site" [decision document #34]. Documents in the Cholmondeley project record acknowledge this, but also provide additional analysis and rationale for why the Clover Bay site was preferred over the Island Point site. The additional costs of the road needed to access the Island Point site are discussed above. The project record indicates that there were several operational concerns with the Island Point site as well. As discussed in the USFWS findings and in a memo from the transportation planner on the Cholmondeley IDT, the Island Point site appears to be subject to violent storm activity, and strong currents were encountered even at 60 to 80 foot depths [decision documents #34 and #64]. Thus, there would be times when an operator would be unable to operate due to weather and/or water conditions [#64]. The entrance to the Island Point site is more constricted, and there is only room for unloading a barge with a ramp, so an upland log storage area would be needed [ROD, pp. R-11, 24; see also November 13, 2001 IDT meeting notes, project record #1110]. The Forest Supervisor also believed that the Clover Bay site would provide greater future recreational opportunities after logging operations were concluded [ROD, p. R-11]. In my opinion, the Cholmondeley EIS and project record indicate that the Forest Supervisor adequately considered the alternative LTF location at Island Point. While the EIS does not provide much information on why the alternative road location was necessary to access the Island Point LTF, there is information in the record that indicates this alternative location was necessary due to the topography of the area. There is also information in the record that supports the Cholmondeley IDT's use of different costs per mile for the two alternative road locations. Based on my review of the record, the Forest Supervisor's conclusion that "the Clover Bay site is the preferred option" is reasonable. Issue 5. Whether the Cholmondeley project disproportionately harvests high volume old growth habitat in the project area, and whether the information in the EIS relating to the volume classes of the timber within the harvest units is accurate. Discussion Appellants assert that the Forest Service is targeting the best old growth habitat in the project area. In part, this is a forest planning issue, and the decisions on the appeals of the 1997 TLMP recognized that Alternative 11, which was the selected alternative for the Forest Plan, retained Appeal Deciding Officer 14 the greatest amount of the original old growth of those alternatives that scheduled timber harvest. The appeal decisions also recognized that substantial areas of high volume timber are protected from harvest under TLMP standards and guidelines or are in LUDs that generally do not permit timber harvest. The issue of biodiversity was well addressed in the 1997 TLMP, and the mitigation measures provided in TLMP were established to ensure biodiversity on the Tongass National Forest. There is no requirement in TLMP to harvest high volume strata in proportion to its occurrence. With regards to the Cholmondeley project area specifically and the accuracy of the volume class information in the EIS, appellants are correct in stating that volume class information is useful as a predictor of canopy structure for biodiversity analysis [as discussed on p. 3-81 of the EIS]. However, it does not provide a reliable estimate of net timber volume, as discussed below. In the 1979 TLMP, four commercial timber volume classes were established (volume class 4, 8 to 20 thousand board feet (MBF) per acre; volume class 5, 20 to 30 MBF per acre; volume class 6, 30 to 50 MBF per acre; and volume class 7, greater than 50 MBF per acre). These volume classes were based on a timber type inventory that estimated timber and landform conditions based on aerial photo interpretation. Subsequent concerns and studies regarding the reliability of this information were expressed both within and outside the Forest Service, and in 1989 a Forest Service biometrician was commissioned to address these concerns. His review indicated that 1) there was no practical need or statistical difference in three of the four classes with respect to mean board feet per acre; 2) the prospect of being able to interpret the existing timber type map in terms of sawtimber volume per acre appeared dim; and 3) based on information obtained from forest inventories in the field, it appeared that a fairly large portion of the polygons were not classified correctly. Based on these concerns and the litigation relating to them in Wildlife Society v. Barton (Case No. J93-001), alternative methods of assigning site quality (or the capability to produce different timber volumes) to lands supporting old growth forests were considered. Five different options were evaluated. Statistical analysis indicated that three volume strata could be distinguished for the available timberlands using the existing timber inventory and additional information on soils and slopes. The three volume strata are 1) low volume strata � areas within timber inventory volume class 4 on hydric soils with slopes less than or equal to 55 percent; 2) medium volume strata � areas within timber inventory volume classes 5, 6, and 7 on hydric soils with slopes less than or equal to 55 percent, and areas within timber inventory volume class 4 that are either on non-hydric soils or are on hydric soils with slopes greater than 55 percent; and 3) high volume strata � areas within timber inventory volume classes 5, 6, and 7 on non-hydric soils, and on hydric soils with slopes greater than 55 percent. This classification system was used in the 1997 TLMP [see, for example, TLMP EIS, pp. 3-18 to 3-19], and to estimate the volume of timber proposed for harvest in the Cholmondeley project [EIS, p. 3-83]. This is consistent with the management direction provided in TLMP. Appellants attempt to calculate the average volume per acre for each unit harvested and then assign that to a volume class, and assert that their calculations indicate the Forest Service is harvesting a much higher percentage of high volume class timber than is disclosed in the Appeal Deciding Officer 15 Cholmondeley EIS. This is not an appropriate way to estimate the amount of high volume timber proposed for harvest in the Cholmondeley project alternatives, for the same reasons the court in Wildlife Society v. Barton ruled that volume classes cannot be used as a basis for calculating average volume per acre. The percent of acres per volume class harvested disclosed in the EIS [Table 3-15 on p. 3-81] is based on the timber type inventory discussed above and was calculated by overlaying the timber type GIS layer with the harvest unit map. This provides the definitive acres by volume class, and this information is accurately disclosed in the Cholmondeley EIS [Id.]. While this information may be useful in predicting canopy structure for biodiversity, it is not a reliable estimate of net timber volume. The Cholmondeley IDT used volume strata information in calculating the net timber volume for each VCU, by alternative [Table 3-19 on p. 3-83]. This is consistent with TLMP management direction, and the volume strata information disclosed in the Cholmondeley EIS is accurate. Issue 6. Whether the Forest Service complied with Appendix K of TLMP and with the NEPA process in its development of the OGRs for the Cholmondeley project area. Appellants assert that the Forest Service has given timber a priority over Appendix K criteria in its development of the OGRs for the Cholmondeley project area, and that the small OGR in VCU 616 is too linear and too narrow to provide interior habitat and connectivity as required by Appendix K of TLMP. Appellants also assert that Alternative 5's medium OGR fails to incorporate the largest remaining blocks of contiguous old growth, against the recommendations of the Interagency Team reviewing the reserves and for the sole purpose of keeping that old growth in the timber base. Appellants further assert that the Appendix K criteria should be applied to the whole land base rather than just NFS lands of the project area, and that the Forest Service failed to include the Interagency Team's recommendations in the Cholmondeley Draft EIS, even though they were ready for review, thus failing to give the public the opportunity to comment on them. Discussion The Forest Plan (TLMP) identified and mapped a system of large, medium, and small OGRs as part of the Forest-wide old growth habitat reserve strategy. As discussed in TLMP, the mapped large and medium reserves generally achieve reserve strategy objectives and few modifications to these reserves are anticipated. The mapped small reserves received differing levels of groundtruthing and integration of site-specific information in their design during forest planning. Thus, TLMP provides that these reserves may be further evaluated during project level environmental analysis to determine if the size, spacing, and habitat composition of the reserves should be adjusted [TLMP. P. 3-82]. Appendix K of TLMP sets forth the old growth habitat reserve criteria, which serve as guidelines for further evaluating the design of the reserves at the project level. Appendix K states, in part: Appeal Deciding Officer Rules Applicable to all Reserves: 16 A. Spacing should generally consider the four cardinal directions. B. Reserves should be more circular rather than linear in shape to maximize the amount of interior (secure from the effects of forest edge) forest habitat. C. Minimize, to the extent feasible, the amount of early seral habitat and roads within mapped reserves. D. Consider site-specific factors in placing reserves to help meet biodiversity or wildlife habitat objectives. Factors include, but are not limited to: 1. Important deer winter range... 2. Known or suspected goshawk nesting habitat... 3. Known or suspected marbled murrelet nesting habitat... 4. The largest remaining blocks of contiguous old growth within a watershed. 5. Rare features such as underrepresented forest plant associations or stands with some of the Forest's highest volume timber stands. Appendix K also provides the "Basic Criteria for Allocating Reserves," which state that medium reserves should include a contiguous landscape of approximately 10,000 acres, with at least 5,000 acres of productive old growth (POG), and with at least 2,500 acres of this POG in the high volume class strata. For small reserves, Appendix K states that they should include a contiguous landscape of at least 16 percent of each VCU, with 50 percent of that area being POG [TLMP, Appendix K, p. K-1]. The TLMP Implementation Team (TPIT) Policy Clarification Papers (August 1998) provide additional guidance on the OGR evaluation process: The Forest Service interdisciplinary team biologist, and biologists from the Alaska Department of Fish and Game (ADF&G) and the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (USFWS) shall be invited to jointly evaluate, as part of the interdisciplinary NEPA process, the location and composition of the existing small old growth reserves as mapped in TLMP using criteria in Appendix K.... This review should be conducted as early in the project planning process as possible... Biologists from the three agencies should attempt to develop a consensus biological recommendation on small reserve locations. Alternative locations for placement of the small old growth reserves will be considered during project alternative development as necessary. The line officer retains project decision authority on the location of small reserves within the project area. Rationale for the decision of the selected small reserve design will be described in the NEPA document and Record of Decision. [TPIT Clarification Papers, p. 1]. The Cholmondeley record indicates that an interagency review team was convened early in the Cholmondeley planning process. Biologists from ADF&G and USFWS attended an initial meeting with the IDT in January 1998, where adjustments to the small OGRs were discussed, although neither Appendix K criteria nor data relative to size and composition of the existing reserves were available at that meeting [Interagency Recommendation, decision document #81, p. 6]. An interagency group of biologists Appeal Deciding Officer 17 representing ADF&G, USFWS, and the Forest Service (Interagency Team) subsequently conducted a more thorough evaluation of the existing OGRs, and presented their recommendations to the IDT in November 1998. Their review indicated that the small reserves in nearly all of the affected VCUs failed to comply with Appendix K criteria, in spite of the modifications suggested by the IDT [Id.]. Appellants assert that the Forest Service failed to include these recommendations in the Cholmondeley Draft EIS, even though they were ready for review considerably before the release of the Draft. As stated above, the Interagency Team's recommendations were first presented to the IDT in November 1998. The Draft EIS (November 2000) states: An interagency team of biologists... evaluated the small OGRs in the project area. The reserves were assessed for size, spatial location, connectivity, and biological function... Based on this assessment, the following OGR boundary changes are recommended... [Cholmondeley Draft EIS, p. 3-51]. However, the Draft EIS only appears to discuss one "recommendation" of the Interagency Team - Option A for the Monie Lake small OGR in VCU 616 [Draft EIS, p. 3-52]. In fact, in its final recommendation, the Team states "[t]he old growth reserve strategy portrayed in the DEIS does not represent an interagency consensus opinion..." (emphasis in original) [decision document #81, p. 7]. Appellants question why the Interagency Team's recommendations were not included in the Draft EIS, and other appellants assert that the Forest Service specifically instructed the Interagency Team to not final their recommendations until after the Draft had been released [see, for example, Earthjustice appeal]. The Interagency Team recommendations, signed by all three biologists on the Team, states that "[t]he IDT asked the interagency team to hold a written recommendation until publication of the forthcoming DEIS, which was expected within a few months" [decision document #81, p. 6]. The Team's recommendation goes on to state: The possibility of finalizing the biologists' recommendations was discussed with the [Forest Service] Cholmondeley IDT biologist in the fall of 2000 (two years after we were asked to hold our written recommendation). Once again the interagency team was told that a DEIS document was too close to publication for any changes to be made. The DEIS was indeed published within a couple of months. Given that we had been requested to wait to provide our detailed recommendations until after publication of the DEIS, the ADF&G and USFWS resource agency biologists were surprised and concerned to see in the DEIS the analysis and selection by the IDT of a modified version of one preliminary proposal we had discussed. [Id.]. This appears to support appellants' assertions that the Forest Service specifically instructed the Interagency Team to not final their recommendations until after the Draft had been released. However, there are IDT meeting notes in the project record that suggest the Interagency Team had not reached consensus prior to the publication of the Draft EIS. In a November 1998 IDT meeting, the USFWS biologist on the Interagency Team "[h]ad some comments on the [OGRs]. He felt there was not a 3 agency biologist recommendation on the [OGRs]... A formal proposal will be written up between the DEIS and FEIS" [November 11, 1998 IDT meeting notes, project Appeal Deciding Officer 18 record #276]. Therefore, the record is unclear as to why the Interagency Team recommendations were not written and available for review prior to the Draft EIS. The "final" recommendations of the Interagency Team, cited above and signed by all three biologists on the Team, were submitted to the Craig District Ranger in March 2003. With regards to appellants' assertions that the Cholmondeley OGRs do not meet Appendix K criteria, Chapter 3 of the EIS discusses the alternatives considered for the modification of the OGRs in the project area. Alternative 1 (no action) includes the Forest Plan OGRs. Alternatives 2 through 6 include the IDT's modified OGRs. Alternative 7 includes the OGRs recommended by the Interagency Team. The Final EIS discusses the potential modifications to four small OGRs and one medium OGR; the Forest Supervisor's ROD modified two of the small OGRs, (Monie Lake in VCU 616 and Sunny Cove in VCU 675), deferred a decision on the Saltery Cove small OGR (VCU 614), and modified the medium OGR in VCUs 616, 617, and 676. No adjustments were made to the small OGR in VCU 615. As the ROD deferred a decision on the small OGR in Saltery Cove, any issue as to the consistency of those proposed adjustments with TLMP and Appendix K criteria is not ripe for review at this time. Each of the OGR adjustments selected in the Forest Supervisor's decision, along with appellants' concerns with respect to those adjustments, are discussed below. Monie Lake Small OGR (VCU 616): Appellants state that the adjusted small OGR in VCU 616 (Monie Lake) is not consistent with Appendix K criteria and with the Interagency Team's recommendations. This is true, and the Cholmondeley EIS and other documents in the project record disclose it. As indicated in Table 3-29 of the EIS, the Monie Lake small OGR, as adjusted by the IDT and selected by the Forest Supervisor, is more linear than circular and thus does not meet that criteria. The EIS also acknowledges that at its narrowest point, this corridor (the lake buffer around Monie Lake) is only 250 feet wide and does not provide any interior habitat as the width is less than the 1,000 feet recommended in the TPIT Clarification Papers (discussed above). In response to concerns for a wide enough wildlife travel corridor, the Forest Supervisor dropped the northern portions of two units to widen this buffer to 600 feet [ROD, pp. R-4, R-6]. Some appellants assert that the EIS does not adequately disclose the dissenting opinions of the Interagency Team, and that the EIS contains inaccurate statements about the amount of POG in the Team's recommended OGR. In part, this is true. As discussed above, the EIS does disclose the fact that the IDT's OGR is linear rather than circular and that it only maintains a 250-foot (adjusted to 600 feet in the ROD) wildlife travel corridor; however, the EIS does not disclose the Interagency Team's concern (repeated by some appellants) that harvesting two units (not included in the Team's recommended OGR) on the south shore of Monie Lake would fragment the largest block of POG in the VCU, leaving a very narrow strip of forested shoreline along much of the south shore of the lake. The Team also stated that little POG, and essentially no high volume strata, occurs naturally along the north shore of the lake, so fragmentation and loss of habitat to the south of the lake would be very likely to adversely impact not only the movement but also the occurrence of old growth dependent species, and that much of the best deer winter range would be removed, as Appeal Deciding Officer 19 well as the best potential goshawk and murrelet nesting habitat [Interagency Recommendation, decision document #81, p. 15]. The Forest Service Response to Comments appendix of the EIS discusses the adjustments to the Monie Lake OGR: It was not circular in the Forest Plan and it is not now, but it does include some deer winter range as well as some habitat that is more likely to be used by murrelets and goshawks. It also includes a portion of the largest contiguous patch of old growth in the VCU. [EIS, Appendix B, p. B-61]. With regards to the assertion that the EIS contains inaccurate information on the amount of POG in the Team's recommended OGR, it is true that the EIS contains different information than that displayed in the Team's recommendations. The Interagency Team recommended adjustments to the adjacent medium OGR that would have eliminated the need for the small OGR in VCU 616, provided that at least 16 percent of the VCU was incorporated into the medium OGR. In discussing the Team's recommended medium OGR, the EIS states that "the Interagency medium reserve does not meet the minimum 2,500 acres of high volume POG recommended in the Forest Plan [EIS, p. 3-98]. This conflicts with the information in the Team's recommendation, which states that 2,698 acres of high volume POG are included in their recommended medium OGR [decision document #81, p. 8]. In my review of the record, I could not determine why the acreage figures presented in the EIS and those in the Team's recommendation are different. It could be that different data sets were used to determine the acreage of high volume POG, or the EIS could have dropped the reserve acres in VCUs 616 and 675 and left each as separate small reserves not contiguous with the medium reserve. The informal appeal resolution meeting notes forwarded by the Tongass Forest Supervisor suggest that the EIS numbers came from a draft Interagency Recommendation dated February 2002. While the acres of high volume POG for the Interagency Team's recommended medium OGR are close to those presented in the EIS, the other numbers displayed for the medium OGR (total acres and POG acres) are not. Furthermore, the narrative discussion of the Interagency Team's recommended OGR in this draft report imply that the high volume POG acres are met in their recommendation, and a spreadsheet dated March 2002 (one month later) displays the same number of acres as the final recommendation that was signed in March of 2003. Sunny Cove Small OGR (VCU 675): Some appellants assert that the EIS and ROD do not address the Interagency Team's concerns with the IDT's modification of this OGR. This OGR is discussed on pages 3-94 to 3-96 of the EIS, and Table 3-27 indicates that the IDT's modified OGR meets all Appendix K criteria. The Interagency Team stated that the IDT's modified OGR does not include the high value deer winter range immediately north of Sunny Creek, nor does it incorporate forest stands where evidence of goshawk use was documented during field work for the project. The Team concluded that harvest of three units (excluded from the IDT's OGR) would result in severe fragmentation of the only significant block of high volume old growth in the VCU, and would leave only narrow, linear strips of old growth, with little or no interior forest conditions in the high volume strata [decision document #81, p. 19]. The Forest Service Appeal Deciding Officer 20 Response to Comments addresses some of these concerns, stating that "Sunny [Cove] does include some important deer winter range and is more circular than linear, and [includes] known or suspected murrelet or goshawk habitat and portions of the largest remaining contiguous patch of old growth in the watershed" [EIS, Appendix B, p. B-59]. Medium OGR (VCUs 616, 617, and 676): Appellants assert that the modified medium OGR in VCUs 616, 617, and 675 fails to incorporate the largest remaining blocks of contiguous old growth, and that it is linear rather than circular. The Interagency Team expressed similar concerns. The text of the EIS does not address these concerns, and as discussed above, contains information regarding the amount of high volume old growth in the Interagency Team's recommended medium OGR that conflicts with the information in the Team's recommendation. The EIS does indicate that the IDT's medium reserve (selected by the Forest Supervisor) meets or exceeds the Forest Plan requirements of total acres, POG acres, and high volume acres for a medium reserve. With regards to appellants' assertions that Appendix K criteria should be applied to the whole land base rather than just NFS lands, Appendix K is silent as to whether non-Federal lands should be considered when calculating acres for OGRs. However, correspondence in the project record from one of the Forest Service biologists on the TLMP IDT indicates that while all land ownerships were considered in the analysis of the potential cumulative effects on old growth dependent species, only NFS lands were considered in the design and development of the OGRs for each VCU [December 2000 email from Chris Iverson, decision document #192]. Therefore, the Cholmondeley IDT's development and analysis of the OGR modifications (based on NFS lands within each VCU) is consistent with the intent of management direction. Although the Forest Supervisor's rationale is not well articulated in the EIS or ROD, he does provide some reasons for his selection of the IDT's modified OGRs rather than those of the Interagency Team. As stated in the Response to Comments appendix, the modifications made to the OGRs in the project area were made in an attempt to better meet the criteria in Appendix K of TLMP [Appendix B, p. B-60]. In making his decision, the Forest Supervisor indicates that he considered the recommendations of the Interagency Team as well as the alternatives presented by the IDT, and that he "chose an alternative which responds in part to the opportunities identified by the interagency wildlife biologists without significantly further reducing the lands available for timber production" [ROD, p. R-10]. The ROD indicates that the Monie Lake small OGR was further adjusted by the Forest Supervisor to provide for a wider (600-foot) wildlife travel corridor, and that the Forest Supervisor believes that his decision "more adequately addresses concerns about the distribution and connectivity of deer winter range. The new boundary locations encompass, for the most part, the best non-fragmented habitat remaining in the VCUs while still allowing for a viable timber offering" [Id.]. Based on the guidance provided by the TPIT Clarification papers, the Forest Supervisor's decision to adopt the IDT's modifications was within his authority and not inconsistent with the Forest Plan. In summary, the record is clear that some of the OGRs modified by the Cholmondeley exceed some of the Appendix K criteria, and some of the OGRs do not fully meet all of the Appendix K criteria. Appeal Deciding Officer 21 Appendix K is not in itself a forest plan standard and guideline. The relevant standards and guidelines are WILD112 (II)(B) [TLMP p. 4-112] and WILD112 (XVIII) [TLMP, p. 4-120]. In particular, WILD112 (XVIII) provides that "[t]he objective is to provide corridors of old growth forest among large and medium old growth habitat reserves (Appendix K) and other natural setting [LUDs] at the landscape scale." During plan revision, the TLMP IDT used the information available to them at the landscape level to initially map large, medium, and small OGRs in the Forest Plan. The Plan recognized, however, that landscape level mapping had significant limitations and was likely to designate OGRs that either fell short of accomplishing the landscape connectivity objective or exceeded what was necessary to accomplish the landscape connectivity objective. Thus, WILD112 (XVIII) explicitly provides for modification of OGRs during project analysis when more site-specific information is available to evaluate the OGR design. It further provides criteria to consider in making modifications, including the criteria in Appendix K of the Plan. It is important to not overstate, nor understate, the relevancy of Appendix K criteria. The purpose of the Appendix K criteria is to "serve as guidelines for further evaluating the design of reserves at the project level as described in the Old Growth Habitat [LUD] Standards and Guidelines (Wildlife section)." The Forest Plan states that guidelines are not absolute requirements, but ways of achieving the standards or meeting the other needs of the resource [TLMP, p. 1-4]. The ultimate focus should be on the overall goal of providing the abundance and distribution of habitat necessary to maintain viable populations of existing native and desirable non-native species well-distributed in the planning area [WILD112 (II)(B)]. Landscape connectivity [WILD112 (XVIII)] plays an important role in achieving that goal, and OGRs likewise play an important role in landscape connectivity. Landscape connectivity is a complex concept, involving many factors, especially in the complicated and varied terrain of the Tongass. Appendix K criteria are not "magic numbers" that are the minimum necessary for connectivity; rather, they are "rules of thumb" that provide landscape planners with relative confidence to consider connectivity across the landscape in the long run. They also provide project planners with more workable criteria to consider at the project level. Landscape connectivity is not the only goal of the Forest Plan and does not necessarily take precedence over other goals in a particular project. As stated above, the line officer retains project decision authority on the location of small reserves within the project area. Although they are not mandatory standards, Appendix K criteria are important considerations. The Forest Supervisor established a special process in the TPIT Clarification Papers to ensure that particular attention is paid to the biological aspect of OGR placement by providing the IDT and line officer with a multi-agency, single-discipline team recommendation on the best biological placement of the OGRs. The changes to the OGRs are considered forest plan amendments, thus ensuring forest plan amendment requirements for analysis and public participation. Through these procedural requirements, the forest plan provides for an especially heightened importance of landscape connectivity goals while providing needed flexibility at the project level. There is a legitimate concern that a process of multiple project level adjustments in the OGR system could, over time, prevent the attainment of plan level landscape connectivity goals if the project decisions consistently reduced the designated OGRs below the Appendix K criteria. The Appeal Deciding Officer 22 annual Tongass Monitoring and Evaluation Report tracks the cumulative adjustments made in the OGRs by project level decisions. Sixteen project level adjustments to OGRs have been completed through September 2002 [2002 Monitoring Report, p. 2-8]. Of the sixteen adjustments to the OGRs, most decisions increased the total OGR acres and POG acres above the Appendix K guidelines. Two decisions (Crystal Creek and Todahl Backline) did not meet the POG acres criteria in Appendix K, and one decision (Crystal Creek) did not meet the total OGR acres criteria in Appendix K. Overall, the sixteen decisions provided 13,725 acres more to the OGRs, including 9,310 more acres of POG, than indicated by the Appendix K criteria. The net effect of the sixteen adjustments compared to the originally mapped OGRs has been the increase of the total OGR system by 12,644 acres, including an increase in POG of 5,336 acres. Thus, the cumulative effect of adjustments to the OGRs has been to increase the total size and POG acres of the OGRs, and these adjustments do not appear to prevent the attainment of landscape connectivity. Issue 7. Whether the Cholmondeley project adequately protects northern goshawk habitat. Appellants assert that the Forest Service used inappropriate inventory protocols in conducting the goshawk surveys for the Cholmondeley project. Appellants also assert that the Forest Service failed to adequately consider past harvesting and the potential cumulative effects on northern goshawk habitat. Discussion The Forest Plan standards and guidelines for sensitive species state that the Forest Service shall "[c]onduct inventories to determine the presence of nesting goshawks for proposed projects. Use the most current inventory protocols developed in cooperation with appropriate State and Federal agencies" [TLMP, p. 4-91]. The Wildlife Resource Report prepared for the Cholmondeley project discusses the surveys that were completed in the project area, and states that these surveys followed the Alaska Region Goshawk Inventory Protocol first issued in June 1992, and that in the summer of 1997 a combination of survey methods was used [decision document #161, p. 8]. The Report states: The chances of observing a goshawk were increased if more time was spent in sitting at an overlook and observing an area of good habitat. This technique was used in conjunction with the traditional method of broadcasting recorded goshawk calls while walking through units and other areas of habitat... Broadcast and overlook surveys were completed on 75 points in the Cholmondeley project area. Of the 45 potential units in the unit pool, 39 (87 percent) contained at least one broadcast or overlook station. A total of 7,610 acres were surveyed. Field crews found no goshawk nests nor had any audio detections. Plucked feathers were found at two different locations in the Sunny Creek watershed. These areas were repeatedly surveyed with no other results. Appeal Deciding Officer 23 [Id]. In my opinion, the goshawk surveys conducted for the Cholmondeley project were more intensive than those required under TLMP, and the Forest was not required to conduct other inventories under the Crocker-Bedford protocol referred to by appellants. Any goshawk nest found prior to or during harvest will be protected utilizing TLMP goshawk standards and guidelines [EIS, Appendix D, p. D-31]. With regards to whether the Cholmondeley EIS adequately considered past harvesting and cumulative effects on northern goshawk habitat, the analysis of the potential cumulative effects on the goshawk in the EIS is limited and tends to concentrate on future NFS harvest rather than the cumulative effects of past harvest on all lands within the project area [EIS, p. 3-111]. However, the Biological Evaluation (BE) conducted for the project has more information on the potential effects of the project on goshawks, and acknowledges that "harvesting of the units in the Cholmondeley project would increase the amount of early seral forest, thus reducing the cumulative landscape habitat quality" [EIS, Appendix D, p. D-30]. Cumulative effects on wide-ranging species such as the goshawk were assessed in the TLMP EIS, which is a more appropriate scale than the project level. The Forest Plan's conservation strategy was designed to provide the habitat necessary to maintain viable and well-distributed populations of goshawks across the entire Tongass National Forest. Projects consistent with the TLMP land allocations (especially the OGRs) and beach fringe and riparian habitat buffers are assumed to be adequate to sustain well-distributed goshawk habitat and comply with population viability requirements. Issue 8. Whether the information in the Cholmondeley EIS regarding detrimental soil conditions within the project area is accurate. Appellants assert that soil conditions are already below Alaska Region soil quality standards before timber harvest, and that some of the harvest units in the Monie Creek watershed will further exceed the standards. Discussion The Alaska Region's Soil Quality Standards [Region 10 Supplement No. 2500-92-1] are designed to provide reasonable assurance that no long term losses in inherent productivity of the soil will result from land management activities. These standards state that a minimum of 85 percent of an area should be left in a condition of acceptable productivity potential for trees and other managed vegetation following land management activities. The Cholmondeley project area contains two separate "activity areas" for analysis - harvest units and watersheds. Table 3-39 on page 3-121 of the Cholmondeley EIS provides the estimated acres of roads and soil displacement by alternative within each major watershed. This table indicates that for Alternative 5, harvest units total 389 acres within the Monie Creek watershed. The 19 acres of soil displacement are estimates of detrimental soil conditions within the harvest units created by felling and yarding logs during future harvest. Based on these acreages, detrimental soil conditions as a result of logging activities is expected to be at 5 percent within the harvest units of the Monie Creek watershed. Appeal Deciding Officer 24 Table 3-39 also displays the total number of acres affected by road construction within each watershed, including both temporary roads and specified roads. Temporary roads are considered soil displacement and contribute to detrimental soil conditions within harvest units; specified roads are not. While this table displays 55 acres of roads and rock pits for the watershed, evidently it was based on outdated GIS information. This information has since been updated to reflect slight changes in road alignments, road additions, and road deletions for this alternative. The total number of acres within the Monie Creek watershed affected by road construction is 44.24 acres, less than the 55 acres indicated in the EIS. Of the 44.24 acres, only about 6.62 acres are affected by temporary roads and associated rock pits within the boundaries of the harvest units. The temporary roads and associated rock pits add about 1.4 percent disturbance to the estimated 5 percent discussed above, for a total detrimental soil condition in the Monie Creek harvest units estimated at 6.4 percent of the harvest unit acreage [see Exhibit B for a discussion of this clarification]. Approximately 37.31 acres of specified roads are planned within the harvest units in the Monie Creek watershed; however, as indicated above, specified roads do not contribute towards detrimental soil conditions [Id.; see also R10 Supplement No. 2500-92-1]. Detrimental soil conditions for the Monie Creek watershed include all disturbance incurred within the harvest units, plus disturbance from temporary roads and associated rock pits planned throughout the watershed. Temporary roads and rock pits affect 6.93 acres of the Monie Creek watershed. Based on the total watershed acreage of 2,079 acres and the amount of soil affected by logging activities and temporary roads and associated rock pits, detrimental soil condition for the watershed is estimated at 1.25 percent. Based upon the analysis in the Cholmondeley EIS and project record, detrimental soil conditions for both the harvest units within the Monie Creek watershed (6.4 percent within the harvest unit acreage) and for the total watershed (1.25 percent of the watershed) appear to be well within the thresholds for detrimental soil displacement set forth in the Alaska Region's soil quality standards. Issue 9. Whether the Forest Service adequately responded to public comments on the Draft EIS for the Cholmondeley project. Appellants assert that the Forest Service failed to attach all substantive comments to the Final EIS, and that the Forest Service failed to respond to some of the substantive comments received on the Draft EIS. Appellants further assert that the comments were not readily available for review as they were difficult to locate and read on the project record CD. Discussion The regulations implementing NEPA at 40 CFR 1503.4 state: Appeal Deciding Officer 25 (a) An agency preparing a final [EIS] shall assess and consider comments both individually and collectively, and shall respond by one or more of the means listed below, stating its response in the final statement. Possible responses are to: (1) Modify alternatives including the proposed action. (2) Develop and evaluate alternatives not previously given serious consideration... (3) Supplement, improve, or modify its analyses. (4) Make factual corrections. (5) Explain why the comments do not warrant further agency response. (b) All substantive comments received on the draft statement (or summaries thereof where the response has been exceptionally voluminous) should be attached to the final statement whether or not the comment is thought to merit individual discussion by the agency in the text of the statement. The Forest Service Environmental Policies and Procedures Handbook (FSH 1909.15) provides further guidance on responding to comments, stating that "[w]hen the Responsible Official determines that a summary of responses is appropriate, the summary must reflect accurately all substantive comments received on the Draft EIS. Comments that are pertinent to the same subject may be aggregated by categories" [FSH 1909.15, 24.1(2)]. Appendix B of the EIS contains the Forest Service Response to Comments on the Draft EIS. This Appendix describes the process that was used to analyze and respond to the comments that were received, and then goes on to identify the categories and subcategories of the comments and to provide the Forest Service response to those comments. As stated on page 1 of this Appendix, 169 letters, faxes, phone calls, and emails were received on the Cholmondeley Draft EIS. Of these, 151 contained substantive comments. These comments were analyzed using a process called content analysis, where relevant issues are identified and categorized. Examples of some specific comments within each category are provided to represent the concerns and public sentiment expressed within each category of comments. This "content analysis" process is a common method of responding to public comments on agency NEPA documents where the response has been voluminous, and is consistent with NEPA, its implementing regulations, and Forest Service NEPA policies and procedures. Appellants assert that the Forest Service failed to respond to all substantive comments on the Cholmondeley Draft EIS, but the only example they provide to support this assertion is a claim that the agency failed to respond to the Alaska Forest Association's (AFA's) comments relating to the proposed use of a temporary barge facility. As discussed below in response to Issue 3 of the Earthjustice appeal, the Forest Service has considered AFA's proposal. While this proposal is innovative and potentially capable of reducing fill and bark coverage in marine waters, the concept has never been implemented and there are several operational-design considerations that remain to be worked out before this proposal could be considered practicable. Appellants also assert that the public comments were not readily available for review as they were difficult to locate and read on the project record CD. While some documents on this CD may be hard to read, appellants had other means of reviewing the public comments received on Appeal Deciding Officer 26 the Draft EIS for the Cholmondeley project. The Draft EIS clearly stated that the project record was available for public review during regular business hours, and that information was available upon request [Draft EIS, p. 3-1]. Based on my review of the record and Appendix B of the EIS, public comments on the Draft EIS for the Cholmondeley project were appropriately reviewed and considered. Summaries of these comments and the Forest Service response to these comments are included in Appendix B. Copies of all comments from Federal, State, and local agencies and elected officials are also included in this appendix, consistent with Forest Service policy. Issue 10. Whether the Forest Service should have prepared a Supplemental Draft EIS for the Cholmondeley project. Appellants assert that the Forest Service should have prepared a Supplemental Draft EIS for the project because of the amount of new information in the Final EIS, particularly the new alternatives presented in the Final EIS and the Interagency Team's recommendations for the OGRs. Appellants also assert that the Forest Service should prepare a Supplemental Draft EIS because of the inaccurate information in the economics section of the EIS, particularly the information on the costs of Alternative 6, and that the Forest Service should design a reasonable alternative to access the Island Point LTF site and present that to the public for review. Discussion The regulations implementing NEPA at 40 CFR 1502.9(c) state: Agencies: (1) shall prepare supplements to either draft or final [EISs] if: (i) The agency makes substantial changes in the proposed action that are relevant to environmental concerns; or (ii) There are significant new circumstances or information relevant to environmental concerns and bearing on the proposed action or its impacts. The regulations also state that "[i]f a draft is so inadequate as to preclude meaningful analysis, the agency shall prepare and circulate a revised draft..." [40 CFR 1502.9(a)]. Appellants assert that the Forest Service should have prepared a Supplemental Draft EIS because of the amount of new information in the Final EIS, particularly the two new alternatives (Alternative 6, accessing the Island Point LTF site, and Alternative 7, which reflected the Interagency Team's recommended OGRs). I disagree. The Cholmondeley EIS discusses the reasons why the two new alternatives were considered in the Final EIS, and states that these alternatives were added "to provide a better range of alternatives while looking at specific issues" [EIS, p. 2-4]. Alternative 6 was developed in response to public and agency concerns about the potential effects on Clover Bay. This alternative would have avoided some of those effects by transporting the volume out of an LTF at Island Point instead of Clover Bay. Alternative 7 was developed to better depict the Interagency Team's OGR recommendations. The development of these alternatives is entirely consistent with the regulations implementing NEPA at 40 CFR 1503.4(a)(2), which state that one possible response to public comments on a Draft EIS is to Appeal Deciding Officer 27 "[d]evelop and evaluate alternatives not previously given serious consideration by the agency." The Forest Service is not required to prepare a Supplemental EIS when it develops one or more additional alternatives in response to public or agency comments on a Draft EIS. Appellants also assert that a Supplemental EIS should be prepared because of the inaccurate information in the economics section of the EIS, particularly the information on the costs of Alternative 6. As discussed above in response to Issue 4 of the Sierra Club appeal, the Cholmondeley EIS and project record demonstrate that an alternative road location was necessary to access the Island Point LTF site. This road alignment was at a lower elevation and closer to fish habitat and other resource concerns, and where stream size and topography are very different than the road location in Alternative 5. While the construction difficulty was considered the same, the additional costs of the Class I stream crossings at the lower elevation increased the costs per mile for the road. Therefore, the information in the EIS regarding the costs of Alternative 6 is accurate. See Issues 1 and 6, above, for a further discussion of the economic information disclosed in the Cholmondeley EIS and the Forest Service consideration of the Interagency Team's recommended OGRs for the project area. Based on my review of the record, the information in the EIS and project record provided the Forest Supervisor with sufficient information upon which to base his decision, and a Supplemental Draft EIS was not necessary. Appeal No. 03-10-00-0008, Earthjustice: Issue 1. Whether the Cholmondeley EIS and ROD fail to adequately discuss the impacts on the lodge owners in Saltery Cove and Clover Bay and interrelated businesses in the Ketchikan area. Appellants assert that the socioeconomic analysis conducted for the Cholmondeley EIS is inadequate as it did not analyze the benefits that these businesses provide to the greater Southeast Alaska community or the financial harm that the lodges and the community will endure from the proposed timber harvest. Appellants further assert that the Forest Service dismissed the concerns of local lodge owners and other information in the record about the effects of timber harvest on tourism and recreation on the Tongass, and that there is no evidence to support the EIS's conclusion that the proposed harvest will not adversely effect the lodge businesses. Appellants also assert that the EIS underestimates the amount of cedar that will be harvested and therefore overestimates the number of jobs the proposed harvest will create, and that the Forest Service has not considered the economic value associated with the existing natural resources of the project area. Discussion As stated in the ROD, the Forest Supervisor has deferred a decision on the Saltery Cove portion of the Cholmondeley project while he continues to work with other agencies and residents towards resolving potential conflicts [ROD, p. R-4]. Thus, the issue as to whether the EIS adequately analyzed the potential effects on lodge owners in Saltery Cove is not ripe for review at this time. Appeal Deciding Officer 28 With regards to the potential effects of the Cholmondeley project on the Clover Bay Lodge, see my response to Issue 3 of the Sierra Club appeal for a complete discussion of this issue. The EIS did consider and disclose the potential effects of the Cholmondeley project alternatives on the Clover Bay Lodge. While these effects may not have been quantified to the extent appellants assert they should have been, the EIS and project record indicate that the Forest Supervisor did consider the annual income of the Lodge and the estimated effects on the workforce associated with the Lodge, along with the other potential effects on the clientele of the Lodge and the resources of Clover Bay. In my opinion, the analysis in the Cholmondeley EIS with respect to the potential effects on the resources, residents, and visitors of Clover Bay is adequate. With respect to whether the EIS appropriately considered the cedar component of the Cholmondeley project in its economic analysis, see my response to Issue 1 of the Sierra Club appeal for a complete discussion of this issue. While the job estimates disclosed in Table 3-7 of the EIS did not account for the cedar that may be exported, the EIS does disclose the fact that 100 percent of AYC is exported and that approximately 50 percent of WRC is typically considered surplus and exported. When the job estimate numbers are adjusted to reflect cedar export, the relative ranking of the alternatives the Forest Supervisor had to choose from does not change. With respect to whether the Forest Service has considered the economic values associated with all of the natural resources of the project area, see Issue 2 of the Forest Conservation Council appeal for a complete discussion of this issue. In my opinion, the analysis of the project's potential effects on non-market values is reasonable, and consistent with Forest Service Manual and Handbook guidance regarding social and economic analyses. Issue 2. Whether the Cholmondeley EIS and ROD adequately disclose the effects on water quality, particularly the effects on drinking water sources. Appellants assert that the EIS's analysis of the project's compliance with the State's water quality standard for turbidity is inadequate, and that the EIS fails to completely analyze the project's compliance with the State's drinking water standards for Class B systems. With respect to Sunny Cove, appellants assert that the Forest Service failed to analyze or predict what turbidity levels will be and how water treatment systems will be able to handle those predicted levels, and that in the absence of this analysis the Forest Service's reliance on Best Management Practices (BMPs) and monitoring is insufficient to guarantee there will be no violations of the water quality turbidity standards. Appellants also assert that there are 18 acres with slopes over 72 percent in one of Sunny Cove's proposed logging areas, and that the Forest Service has not conducted an on-site analysis of the effects on drinking water sources from logging these areas and has not analyzed the cumulative effects from mass wasting and road construction in these areas. With respect to Saltery Cove, appellants assert that the Forest Service has failed to account for the fact that the two roads crossing streams in this watershed would likely slope towards the streams, and that the EIS contains no analysis or discussion of whether the proposed activities in this area are consistent with the State's drinking water standards for turbidity. Appeal Deciding Officer Discussion 29 As stated in the ROD, the Forest Supervisor has deferred a decision on the Saltery Cove portion of the Cholmondeley project while he continues to work with other agencies and residents towards resolving potential conflicts [ROD, p. R-4]. Thus, the issue as to whether the proposed activities in this area are consistent with the State's drinking water standards is not ripe for review at this time. With respect to Sunny Cove, appellants question the analysis of the effects of the proposed road through the Drinking Water Creek watershed (Road #2170000), which requires four stream crossings [EIS, p. 3-42]. The Alaska Department of Environmental Conservation's (ADEC) comments on the Cholmondeley EIS indicate that they had concerns with the culvert installation proposed at the four crossing sites on this road. They believed that despite the mitigation measures proposed to minimize the amount of sediment delivery during installation, sediment would be generated during excavation activities and would very likely be transported downstream to the water intake. Their comments stated: ... log stringer bridges must be used at these crossing sites to avoid the substantial sedimentation that would occur during culvert installation and removal. If installed correctly, these short bridges would require no instream work and would, therefore, maintain water quality at or near background levels and be in compliance with the Alaska Water Quality Standard for turbidity... [EIS page B-98]. The ROD states that log stringer bridges instead of culverts will be used to cross all domestic water streams [ROD, p. R-15]. Based on the analysis in the EIS and project record, the Forest Supervisor concluded that the use of log stringer bridges instead of culverts and the implementation of Best Management Practices (BMPs) and additional mitigation measures will limit sediment production in the domestic water streams [ROD, p. R-15]. Appellants question unit 675-033, and assert that there is no analysis regarding the potential effects on Sunny Cove's drinking water supply from the combined risks of mass wasting and road construction. Unit 675-033 is located upslope from a tributary to Sunny Creek, not Drinking Water Creek. Thus, the intakes that provide drinking water to Sunny Cove residents will not be affected. Based on the analysis in the EIS and project record, the Forest Supervisor concluded that with the implementation of BMPs and other water quality standards and guidelines, the Selected Alternative would not have any measurable effects on water quality. Additional mitigation measures to address water quality issues in domestic water watersheds are listed on pages 6 and 7 of the ROD. In my opinion, there is sufficient information in the Cholmondeley EIS and project record to support the Forest Supervisor's conclusion that the project will not result in violations of the State's turbidity and drinking water standard. Appeal Deciding Officer 30 Issue 3. Whether the Forest Service complied with NEPA in its development of the alternatives for the Cholmondeley project. Appellants assert that the Forest Service unnecessarily and arbitrarily realigned the roads of Alternative 5 in its development of Alternative 6 in such a way as to make Alternative 6 not viable, and that it failed to conclude that the Clover Bay site was the best location for the LTF. Appellants further assert that the Forest Service should have developed an alternative that involved using a temporary barge transfer facility, and that the Forest Service failed to respond to public and agency comments on this issue. Discussion See my response to Issue 4 of the Sierra Club appeal for a complete discussion as to whether the Forest Service's development and analysis of Alternative 6, which proposed the use of the Island Point LTF site rather than the Clover Bay LTF, is adequate. In my opinion, the Cholmondeley EIS and project record indicate that the Forest Supervisor adequately considered the alternative LTF location at Island Point. While the EIS does not provide much information on why the alternative road location was necessary to access the Island Point LTF, there is information in the record that indicates this alternative location was necessary due to the topography of the area. There is also information in the record that supports the Cholmondeley IDT's use of different costs per mile for the two alternative road locations. Based on my review of the record, the Forest Supervisor's conclusion that "the Clover Bay site is the preferred option" is reasonable. Appellants also assert that a temporary barge transfer facility should have been considered, and refer to a proposal provided by Steve Seeley of Pacific Log and Lumber Ltd. at an ADECsponsored Science and Technical Task Force on Log Transfer Facilities (LTFs) [May 19, 2002.] This concept is not new, nor original with Seeley. The Alaska Pulp Corporation proposed a very similar concept in the late 80's or early 90's for access to a watershed along the north side of Peril Straits. The Regional Office Engineering and Aviation Management Staff has reviewed the proposal submitted by Mr. Seeley, and while it is innovative and potentially capable of reducing fill and bark coverage in marine waters, the proposal has never progressed beyond being a concept and there are several operational-design considerations that remain to be worked out to make the proposal practicable. The general layout concept is used at a number of barge terminals around Southeast Alaska, but those are long-term facilities and are sized for shipping containers rather than log handling. Log handling involves a much wider clear spacing. The technology development and technical design process necessary to implement the Seeley proposal will likely take several years to complete, and there is no guarantee that the results will be successful. Appellants also assert that the Forest Service failed to respond to public and agency comments regarding the use of the proposed barge transfer facility. Appendix B indicates that the Forest Supervisor did consider and respond to the timber industry's comments requesting that the Forest Service consider the use of this type of facility [EIS, Appendix B, pp. B-35 to B-36]. Appeal Deciding Officer 31 Issue 4. Whether the EIS adequately analyzed the potential effects of the Cholmondeley project on wildlife. Appellants assert that the Forest Service failed to respond to their comments on the project's effects on wildlife. Appellants also assert that the Forest Service failed to comply with TLMP in its development of the OGRs in the project area, and that the Forest Service's dismissal of Alternative 7 because it does not provide for sufficient timber production is inconsistent with TLMP. Appellants further assert that the EIS contains inaccurate information in its analysis of the Interagency Team's recommendation (Alternative 7). Discussion See my response to Issue 6 of the Sierra Club appeal for a complete discussion as to whether the Forest Service complied with TLMP in its development of the OGRs for the Cholmondeley project area. Based on the guidance provided by the TPIT Clarification papers, the Forest Supervisor's decision to adopt the OGRs developed by the IDT rather than the Interagency Team's recommended OGRs was within his authority and not inconsistent with the Forest Plan. Appellants also assert that the Forest Service did not respond to their comments on the potential effects of the project on wildlife, particularly bald eagles and seals. As discussed in the EIS, most bald eagle nests are protected within the 1000-foot beach buffer, and any road construction or reconstruction that will occur within a half mile of any eagle nest will follow Forest Plan standards and guidelines [EIS, p. 3-105]. The road cards for the roads included in the Selected Alternative indicate that eagle nests were located on two road segments. These road cards stipulate compliance with the Interagency Agreement between the USFWS and the Forest Service, and that written coordination will be documented. A minimum 330-foot buffer will be maintained around the nests [ROD, pp. A3-5, A3-22]. The ROD also addresses protection and mitigation measures for bald eagle nests, stating: Management activities within 330 feet of an eagle nest site are restricted by an Interagency Agreement between the Forest Service and the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service to facilitate compliance with the Bald Eagle Protection Act. The selected alternative plans no road construction within 330 feet of any known bald eagle nests. [ROD, p. R-30]. In my opinion, the record indicates that the Forest Supervisor considered the potential effects of the project on bald eagles and will implement appropriate measures to mitigate any adverse effects. While the EIS does not specifically address any potential effects on seal haul-outs, the Biological Evaluation (BE) prepared for the project reiterates the TLMP standards and guidelines that were designed to avoid any negative impact on marine mammals. In my opinion, application of these standards and guidelines will adequately protect marine mammals and their habitats. Appeal Deciding Officer 32 See my response to Issue 11 of the Sitka Conservation Society appeal for addition discussion of the potential effects of the Cholmondeley project on wildlife. In my opinion, the analysis in the EIS and project record with respect to the potential effects on wildlife is adequate. Issue 5. Whether the proposed timber harvest associated with the Cholmondeley project violates the Coastal Zone Management Act (CZMA). Appellants assert that the Cholmondeley project is inconsistent with the CZMA and with the Alaska Forest Resources and Practices Act (AFRPA) as it will significantly harm or ruin the Clover Bay and Sportman's Cove Lodges. Appellants also assert that the project is inconsistent with the Acts as it will degrade water quality and cause violations of the turbidity drinking and water quality standards. Appellants further assert that the project is inconsistent with the AFRPA's requirement that OGRs be selected on the basis of location and function, not acreage. Discussion The CZMA requires that Forest Service activities be consistent with the enforceable policies of the Alaska Coastal Management Program (ACMP) to the maximum extent practicable when those activities affect the coastal zone. Based on the analysis in the EIS and his review of the AFRPA, the Forest Supervisor concluded that the Selected Alternative is consistent, to the maximum extent practicable, with the enforceable policies of the ACMP. The State objected to that determination. As the Forest Supervisor deferred a decision on the Saltery Cove portion of the project, the State's objections to that portion of the project are moot for the time being. The Forest Supervisor addressed the remaining concerns in an April 21, 2003 letter to the State of Alaska [Exhibit C]. Appellants' issues relating to the Cholmondeley project's consistency with CZMA mirror the State of Alaska's concerns set forth in their October 17, 2002 ACMP consistency letter. As stated above, the Forest Supervisor has deferred a decision on the Saltery Cove portion of the project, so the issues related to the potential effects on the Saltery Cove water supply and the Sportsman's Cove Lodge are not ripe for review at this time. Appellants assert that the ROD is not consistent with AFRPA as it will significantly harm or ruin the Clover Bay Lodge. As pointed out in the Forest Supervisor's response to the State, their objections appear to conflict with the Alaska Department of Natural Resources' (ADNR) Prince of Wales Area Plan (revised in October of 1998) which recognizes the lodge in Clover Bay but states that tidelands and submerged lands will be managed for support facilities for commercial timber harvest activities [Exhibit C]. As discussed above in my response to Issue 3 of the Sierra Club appeal, the Cholmondeley EIS considered and disclosed the potential effects of the Cholmondeley project alternatives on the Clover Bay Lodge. In order to reduce the effects on Clover Bay, specific mitigation measures were included in the Selected Alternative, including locating the operating area in a way that will create a screen of at least 60 to 75 feet ranging up to about 150 feet that will hide much of this development from the Bay; using a 60-foot vegetative buffer to screen the short road from the ramp to the operating area; moving the northern boundary of one unit to minimize visibility of the unit from the Bay; using a low angle ramp LTF style, which has the least visual impact; and limiting activities near Clover Bay between June 1 Appeal Deciding Officer 33 and August 15 if possible [EIS, pp. 3-33 to 3-38; ROD, p. R-14]. In my opinion, this represents a reasonable effort to minimize any potential adverse effects on the resources, residents, and visitors of Clover Bay. Appellants also assert that the project is inconsistent with the Acts as it will degrade water quality and cause violations of the turbidity drinking and water quality standards. See my response to Issue 2, above, for a discussion of whether the Cholmondeley project violates the State's water quality standards in Drinking Water Creek, the drinking water supply for Sunny Cove residents. Based on the analysis in the EIS and project record, the Forest Supervisor concluded that with the implementation of BMPs and other water quality standards and guidelines, the Selected Alternative would not have any measurable effects on water quality. Additional mitigation measures to address water quality issues in domestic water watersheds are listed on pages 6 and 7 of the ROD. In my opinion, there is sufficient information in the Cholmondeley EIS and project record to support the Forest Supervisor's conclusion that the project will not result in violations of the State's turbidity and drinking water standard for Drinking Water Creek. Appellants assert that the project is inconsistent with the AFRPA's requirement that "allowance shall be made for important fish and wildlife habitat." The Forest Plan incorporates an old growth habitat conservation strategy, comprised of small, medium, and large reserves distributed across the Tongass National Forest. This is an allowance made for important fish and wildlife habitat. Other land allocations and numerous standards and guidelines included in the Forest Plan, as well as site-specific mitigation measures developed during project level NEPA analyses, also make allowance for important fish and wildlife habitat [Cholmondeley ROD, p. R-20]. With regards to the Cholmondeley project specifically, see my response to Issue 6 of the Sierra Club appeal for a complete discussion of the OGR modifications included in the Selected Alternative. Appendix K clearly states that its criteria "serve as guidelines for further evaluating the design of reserves at the project level" [EIS, Appendix K, p. K-1]. The Forest Plan indicates that "guidelines" are not absolute requirements, but ways of achieving the standards or meeting other needs of the resource" [TLMP, p. 1-4]. Appendix K requires that these site-specific factors be considered in adjusting OGR boundaries, but it does not require that these factors override other multiple use objectives. The 1998 TPIT Clarification Papers make it clear that "[t]he line officer retains project decision authority on the location of small reserves within the project area." In my opinion, there is sufficient information in the Cholmondeley EIS, ROD, and project record to support the Forest Supervisor's finding that the Selected Alternative is consistent, to the maximum extent practicable, with the enforceable policies of the ACMP [see Exhibit C for further information]. Issue 6. Whether the Forest Service has adequately analyzed the wilderness values of the Cholmondeley project area, and whether it can proceed with the project prior to analyzing those values. Appeal Deciding Officer Discussion 34 In large part, appellants are arguing forest planning issues that are outside the scope of this project level EIS. In compliance with Forest Service regulations, policy, and procedures, the potential wilderness values of roadless areas throughout the Tongass National Forest were thoroughly inventoried and evaluated at the forest planning level, as discussed in the Supplemental EIS for Roadless Area Evaluation for Wilderness Recommendations [TLMP SEIS, February 2003]. The roadless area analysis for the Cholmondeley project was based on the 2003 Roadless Inventory conducted for the TLMP SEIS. The Cholmondeley project area is located on the eastern two-thirds of the McKenzie Roadless Area (#519), which is located on the east-central part of Prince of Wales Island. With regards to the McKenzie Roadless Area, the TLMP SEIS considered the wilderness potential of the area: The majority of the McKenzie Roadless Area is unmodified and in a natural condition. However, the western portion and the Chasina Point portion are heavily influenced by nearby developments. The area has high natural integrity and apparent naturalness... The area has moderate to high scenic quality; approximately 29 percent of the landscape was considered distinctive from a scenery standpoint. [TLMP SEIS, Appendix C, p. C2-462]. As stated in the EIS, portions of this Roadless Area have been designated for development since 1979, and some portions have already been developed [EIS, p. 1-17]. The 1997 TLMP allocated approximately 45 percent of the McKenzie Roadless Area to the timber production LUD, and about 10 percent of the Roadless Area to the modified landscape LUD. The remaining acres were allocated to LUDs that generally do not allow timber harvest and road construction [TLMP SEIS, Appendix C, p. C2-455]. The "roadless character" of the McKenzie Roadless Area was identified as a significant issue in the Cholmondeley EIS [Draft EIS, p. 1-13; Final EIS, p. 1-17; ROD, p. R-17). Key issue indicators used to analyze the potential effects on the McKenzie Roadless Area included the amount of remaining old growth; changes to ROS; remaining roadless acres; number of new LTFs; duration of equipment presence; and effects on solitude. These indicators are summarized in Table 2 of the EIS [pp. 2-30 to 2-31]. The EIS discusses the wilderness potential of the McKenzie Roadless Area and the potential effects of the alternatives on pages 3-71 to 3-75. This analysis considered the area's proximity to wilderness and other inventoried roadless areas and the proximity to non-NFS lands that could be developed. The EIS discusses the wilderness potential of the Roadless Area, its Wilderness Attribute Rating System (WARS) rating, the RARE II process that first rated the unroaded areas of the Tongass National Forest, and the resources of the area. The EIS indicates that "[t]he roadless area is in the interior of the project area and is an area of rugged terrain and lake basins. This area would be eligible for future considerations as wilderness, regardless of the action alternative chosen" [EIS, p. 3-73]. Based on the analysis in the EIS, the Forest Supervisor concluded: Appeal Deciding Officer 35 The Selected Alternative includes little effect to the inventoried roadless acres. In the project area, over 95 percent of the McKenzie Roadless Area remains unaffected and over 91 percent of the productive old growth will remain after harvest operations. [ROD, p. R-13]. The Forest Supervisor also concluded that the majority of the project area remains in a natural, undeveloped character, and that over 72 percent of the McKenzie Roadless Area remains intact and eligible for future consideration as wilderness [ROD, p. R-18]. The ROD indicates that the Forest Supervisor considered dropping all harvest units and roads within the McKenzie Roadless Area. The Forest Supervisor stated: I have carefully considered the timing of this decision in view of ongoing changes in agency regulations and pending litigation. While I appreciate and understand the comments advising to delay this decision until such time as greater certainty exists regarding roadless area management, consideration of wilderness values, and other current events, the need to complete analyses in a timely manner is compelling. [ROD, p. 8]. As stated in the ROD, the revised TLMP allows for the activities approved in the Forest Supervisor's decision. In my opinion, the Forest Supervisor adequately considered the potential effects of the Cholmondeley project alternatives on the McKenzie Inventoried Roadless Area. The EIS and ROD indicate that the area will remain eligible for future consideration as wilderness. Appeal No. 03-10-00-0009, Southeast Alaska Conservation Council: Issue 1. Whether the Forest Service improperly relied on the desired future condition outlined in TLMP to constrain the range of alternatives for the Cholmondeley project. Discussion The TLMP guides all natural resource management activities and establishes management standards and guidelines for the Tongass National Forest. The primary management direction for the Forest consists of management goals and objectives; management prescriptions for each LUD (which include goals, objectives, desired future condition, and management practices, standards, and guidelines by resource); and Forest-wide standards and guidelines. Within this management framework, project level planning is undertaken to achieve Forest Plan implementation. With regards to the Cholmondeley project, TLMP allocated approximately 38 percent of the NFS lands within the project area to the timber production LUD. These lands are to be managed for the production of sawtimber and other wood products on an even-flow, long-term sustained yield basis. The TLMP allocated an additional 12 percent of the land within the project area to the modified landscape LUD. The desired future condition for these lands states, in part, that they will produce a yield of timber that contributes to the Forest-wide sustained yield. The Appeal Deciding Officer 36 Cholmondeley project is designed to move the project area towards the desired future condition for these LUDs, and to contribute to the harvest levels stipulated in TLMP. Each LUD is managed in accordance with the goals and objectives and standards and guidelines for that LUD. The Council on Environmental Quality (CEQ) has clarified the range of alternatives that must be considered by an agency, stating "[w]hat constitutes a reasonable range of alternatives depends on the nature of the proposal and the facts in each case" [CEQ's 40 Most Asked Questions]. In response to the significant issues identified during scoping, alternatives to the proposed action were developed. These alternatives included a no-action alternative and action alternatives that proposed varying levels of timber harvest, ranging from the harvest of 355 acres (7.8 MMBF) in Alternative 7 up to 1,511 acres (35.6 MMBF) in Alternatives 2 and 5. The Selected Alternative authorized the harvest of 1,225 acres (28.8 MMBF). While all of the action alternatives were designed, in part, to move the project area towards the desired future condition outlined in TLMP, they were also designed to respond to the concerns identified during public involvement for the project and each action alternative represents a different site-specific proposal to respond to these concerns [see EIS, p. 2-3]. Therefore, I do not believe that the range of alternatives was constrained by this desired future condition. In my opinion, the alternatives considered in the Cholmondeley EIS represent an adequate range of alternatives. Issue 2. Whether there is a feasible alternative for road construction through the designated beach fringe buffer in Clover Bay, and whether the Forest Service adequately analyzed it as required by TLMP. Appellants assert that other feasible means of accessing the harvest units exist, including helicopter access and Alternative 6, which moves the LTF from Clover Bay to Island Point. Appellants further assert that the analysis in the EIS fails to support the Forest Supervisor's conclusion that the Clover Bay LTF is "much less expensive," that the Forest Service erred in its analysis of the costs of Alternative 6, and that the Forest Service failed to adequately analyze the other economic and environmental costs associated with the construction and operation of the Clover Bay LTF. Appellants also assert that the analysis in the EIS contradicts the Forest Supervisor's conclusion that "the Clover Bay site requires less road construction, thereby reducing the number of stream crossings and impacts to wetlands and other resources." Discussion The Forest-wide standards and guidelines for beach and estuary fringes are listed on pages 4-4 to 4-5 of TLMP, and state that "[r]oad construction is discouraged in the beach and estuary fringes. Where feasible alternatives are not available, road corridors may be designated" [TLMP, p. 4-5]. Appellants suggest that because there were alternatives to the road construction through the beach fringe (helicopter harvest in Alternatives 2 and 3 and the use of the Island Point LTF site in Alternative 6), the Forest Service was required to select one of them. I disagree. Chapter 2 of the EIS describes the alternatives that were considered for the Cholmondeley project, including Alternatives 2 and 3, which proposed that some or all of the harvest units would be helicopter yarded, and Alternative 6, which proposed the use of the Island Point LTF site verses the LTF at Clover Bay. Chapter 3 of the EIS discusses the potential effects of these Appeal Deciding Officer 37 alternatives, and discloses the results of the estimated economic efficiency analyses conducted for the alternatives. As stated in the ROD, the results of these analyses indicated that Alternatives 2 and 3 were economically infeasible [ROD, pp. R-22 to R-23; see also Table 3-9 in the EIS, p. 3-59]. The Forest Supervisor also decided not to select Alternative 6, stating: I decided not to select Alternative 6 because it would also be deficit in most market conditions. The extreme high cost of the Island Point LTF, its increased upland impacts of the larger sort yard, and more dangerous exposure make it a less desirable site. The additional road required and increased effects to riparian habitat make the Clover Bay LTF the preferred option. [ROD, p. R-24]. Appellants question the Forest Service analysis of the costs of Alternative 6. See my response to Issue 4 of the Sierra Club appeal, above, for a complete discussion of the analysis of Alternative 6. The Cholmondeley EIS and project record demonstrate that an alternative road location was necessary to access the Island Point LTF site. This road alignment was at a lower elevation and closer to fish habitat and other resource concerns and where stream size and topography is very different than the road location in Alternative 5. While the construction difficulty was considered the same, the additional costs of the Class I stream crossings at the lower elevation increased the costs per mile for the road. Therefore, the information in the EIS regarding the costs of Alternative 6 is accurate. Appellants also question the Forest Supervisor's conclusion that "the Clover Bay site requires less road construction, thereby reducing the number of stream crossings and impacts to wetlands and other resources." The road construction in question here is Road #2180000-4, included in the Selected Alternative, verses proposed Road #2180000-5, which would have been constructed to access the Island Point LTF site. Road #2180000-4 is 1.93 miles long and does not cross any Class I streams [see the Road Card in the ROD, pp. A3-34 to A3-36]. The road accessing the Island Point LTF site (proposed road #2180000-5) would have been 2.9 miles long and would have had 3 to 4 stream crossings requiring fish passage and timing windows [Exhibit A]. This road would have roughly paralleled Road #2180000-4, but would have done so at a much lower elevation and closer to fish habitat and other resource concerns [Id.]. It also appears that this road would have had more construction in the beach fringe than the road accessing the Clover Bay LTF [see alternative maps and Exhibit B]. In my opinion, the Forest Supervisor adequately considered alternatives to the road construction in the beach fringe, as required by TLMP, and concluded that these alternatives were not feasible. Based on my review of the record, his conclusion is reasonable. Issue 3. Whether the Forest Service should have prepared a Supplemental Draft EIS for the Cholmondeley project. Appellants assert that the new information leading to the development of Alternatives 6 and 7 in the Final EIS constitute "significant new circumstances or information relevant to environmental concerns and bearing on the proposed action or its impacts" that were not foreseen when other agencies and the public reviewed the Draft EIS. Appeal Deciding Officer Discussion 38 See my response to Issue 10 of the Sierra Club appeal, above, for a complete discussion as to whether the Forest Service should have prepared a Supplemental Draft EIS for the Cholmondeley project. The development of Alternatives 6 and 7 between the Draft and Final EIS was entirely consistent with the regulations implementing NEPA at 40 CFR 1503.4(a)(2), which state that one possible response to public comments on a Draft EIS is to "[d]evelop and evaluate alternatives not previously given serious consideration by the agency." The Forest Service is not required to prepare a Supplemental EIS when it develops one or more additional alternatives in response to public or agency comments on a Draft EIS. Based on my review of the record, the information in the EIS and project record provided the Forest Supervisor with sufficient information upon which to base his decision, and a Supplemental Draft EIS was not necessary. Issue 4. Whether the Cholmondeley EIS evaluated a reasonable range of alternatives. Appellants assert that the Forest Service improperly modified the proposed action between the filing of the Notice of Intent (NOI) for the project and the release of the Draft EIS, thus restricting the range of reasonable alternatives for the project. Discussion As appellants correctly indicate, the NOI for the Cholmondeley project stated "[t]he proposed action is to harvest up to an estimated 37 [MMBF] of timber on an estimated 1,700 acres." Appellants point to the Draft EIS for the project, which stated that the Craig Ranger District "proposes to sell and harvest approximately 37 [MMBF] of timber" [DEIS, p. 1-2], and state that the Forest Service improperly modified this proposed action between the filing of the NOI and the preparation of the Draft EIS, thus restricting the range of alternatives for the project. I find no merit in appellants' assertions. The proposed action in the Draft EIS (Alternative 5) included the harvest of 1,511 acres for an estimated 35.2 MMBF of timber. The other action alternatives ranged from the harvest of 941 acres (providing 23.4 MMBF) to the 1,511 acres (35.2 MMBF, adjusted to 35.6 based on stand information in the Final EIS) in the proposed action. Two additional alternatives were developed and considered in detail in the Final EIS, Alternative 6 (1,486 acres for 33.9 MMBF) and Alternative 7 (355 acres for 7.8 MMBF). Other alternatives were considered but eliminated from detailed consideration [see Chapter 2 of both the Draft and Final EISs] The regulations implementing NEPA at 40 CFR 1501.7 require that a lead agency publish a NOI in the Federal Register "[a]s soon as practicable after its decision to prepare an [EIS]." These regulations do not require that the proposed action be so final as to prohibit further changes before the EIS is prepared. Appellants suggest that the difference in the NOI wording that the Forest Service proposed to harvest "up to" 37 MMBF, verses the DEIS which indicated the proposed action was to harvest 37 MMBF (in fact it was 35.2, not 37 MMBF), restricted the range of alternatives. As indicated in the discussion above, the alternatives considered for the Cholmondeley project ranged from the harvest of 355 acres (7.8 MMBF) in Alternative 7 up to 1,511 acres (35.6 MMBF) in Alternatives 2 and 5. The Selected Alternative authorized the Appeal Deciding Officer harvest of 1,225 acres (28.8 MMBF). In my opinion, this represents an adequate range of alternatives and I do not believe this range was constricted by the difference in the proposed action between the NOI and the Draft EIS. 39 Issue 5. Whether the Cholmondeley EIS complies with NEPA's mandate to "devote substantial treatment" to each of the action alternatives considered in the EIS. Appellants assert that the information disclosed and analyzed for Alternative 6 is inadequate, and that the EIS provides no rationale for why the road alignments were modified in Alternative 6. Discussion See my response to Issue 4 of the Sierra Club appeal, above, for a complete discussion as to whether the information disclosed in the EIS with respect to Alternative 6 is adequate. In my opinion, the Cholmondeley EIS and project record indicate that the Forest Supervisor adequately considered the alternative LTF location at Island Point. While the EIS does not provide much information on why the alternative road location was necessary to access the Island Point LTF, there is information in the record that indicates this alternative location was necessary due to the topography of the area. This information also discusses why different costs were considered for the two alternative road locations. The EIS discloses the potential effects of the alternatives, including Alternative 6. In my opinion, the Cholmondeley EIS provided sufficient information to allow the Forest Supervisor to evaluate the comparative merits of each alternative [40 CFR 1502.14(b)] and to provide a clear basis of choice [1502.14]. Issue 6. Whether the Forest Service improperly relies on the Tongass Timber Reform Act's (TTRA) seek-to-meet market demand provision for the Cholmondeley project. Appellants assert that the Forest Supervisor abused his discretion by elevating the need to supply timber above all other goals and objectives for the project area. Discussion In large part, appellants' assertions regarding the Forest Service's analysis of market demand and its reliance on the TTRA market demand provisions for the purpose and need for the Cholmondeley sale are outside the scope of a project level EIS. See my response to Issue 2 of the Sierra Club appeal, above, for a discussion of the process the Alaska Region uses to comply with Section 101 of the TTRA. As stated in that discussion, clearing a project through the NEPA process is an important step in the process the Alaska Region uses to comply with Section 101 of the TTRA; thus, the Forest Supervisor's conclusion that the Cholmondeley project is a necessary component of the Tongass timber program is reasonable. With regards to whether the Forest Supervisor abused his discretion by elevating the need to supply timber above all other goals and objectives for the project area, the TLMP allocated approximately 38 percent of the NFS lands within the project area to the timber production LUD. Appeal Deciding Officer 40 These lands are to be managed for the production of sawtimber and other wood products on an even-flow, long-term sustained yield basis. The TLMP allocated an additional 12 percent of the land within the project area to the modified landscape LUD. The desired future condition for these lands states, in part, that they will produce a yield of timber that contributes to the Forestwide sustained yield while minimizing the visibility of developments in the foreground distance zone [TLMP, p. 3-135]. The Cholmondeley project is designed to move the project area towards the desired future condition for these LUDs, and to contribute to the harvest levels stipulated in TLMP. Each LUD is managed in accordance with the goals and objectives and standards and guidelines for that LUD. Thus, the Forest Supervisor's decision to harvest timber within the timber production and modified landscape LUDs in the Cholmondeley project area is consistent with the Forest Plan goals and objectives for these areas and within his authority. Issue 7. Whether the Forest Service conducted an adequate on-site analysis to justify timber harvest on slopes greater than 72 percent, as required by TLMP. Appellants assert that the Forest Service failed to comply with TLMP and the Tongass Plan Implementation Team (TPIT) guidance relating to the factors that must be analyzed in deciding whether to allow harvest on slopes greater than 72 percent. Appellants further assert that the Forest Service failed to conduct an on-site analysis of these areas, and that the EIS does not adequately disclose where such harvest will occur. Discussion The Forest-wide standards and guidelines for soil and water state, in part: At the project planning level, the Forest Supervisor or District Ranger may approve timber harvest on slopes of 72% or more on a case by case basis, based upon the results of an on-site analysis of slope and class IV channel stability and an assessment of potential impacts of accelerated erosion on downslope and downstream fish habitat, other beneficial uses of water, and other resources. [TLMP, p. 4-84]. The Cholmondeley EIS discusses the rationale for timber harvest on some slopes over 72 percent [EIS, pp. 3-122 to 3-123]. As indicated in this discussion, several units were dropped from the unit pool; others were modified following soil scientist reconnaissance due to concerns about slope stability and harvest on shallow soils on steep slopes. Some units containing areas with slopes over 72 percent were identified for harvest due to lower than MMI 4 landslide potential or inclusions of an acre or less of slopes over 72 percent [Id.]. The unit cards for the harvest units included in the Selected Alternative indicate that there are 45 acres with slopes greater than 72 percent proposed for harvest. These include units 616-019, 616-021, 616-022, 616-275, 675-033, and 675-037 (totaling 40 acres) where an on-site analysis has been completed. The remaining 5 acres of harvest on slopes greater than 72 percent includes rock outcrops and small inclusions of steep slopes one acre or less in size in units 616-008, 674-548, 675-030, 676-462, and 676-484. The on-site analysis for these units has apparently not yet been completed [see ROD, Appendix 2; see also Exhibit B]. Appeal Deciding Officer 41 The "Floodplains, Soils and Wetlands Resources Report for the Cholmondeley Project Area" indicates that eleven units with harvest on slopes over 72 percent have been evaluated [decision document #11]. This supports the information in the unit cards indicating that an on-site analysis has been completed for most units with harvest on slopes over 72 percent. The TPIT Clarification Papers recognized that the required on-site analysis may not always be completed prior to a decision, stating: If the analysis is undertaken prior to the signing of the ROD, then the approval (if approved) should be located in the ROD and FEIS. If the information is not available prior to the signing of the NEPA document, then it should be located in the Change Analysis (documentation of changes made between the ROD and on-the-ground activities). [TPIT Clarification Papers, p. 9]. In my opinion, the Forest Supervisor's decision is consistent with TLMP, as clarified in the TPIT papers. An on-site analysis was conducted on 40 acres of the 45 acres proposed for harvest on slopes greater than 72 percent. A soil scientist will be involved during pre-sale layout to verify if the small inclusions of slopes greater than 72 percent are suitable for harvest, and the results of this analysis will be documented in the Change Analysis. Issue 8. Whether the Forest Service avoided locating roads on slopes greater than 67 percent, as required by TLMP, and whether it adequately evaluated whether there were feasible alternatives to such road construction. The appellants assert that both Alternatives 6 and 7 provide feasible alternatives to the road location and that the Forest Service refused to evaluate other reasonable alternatives, including one that would include helicopter-yarding. Discussion The Forest-wide standards and guidelines for soil and water state, in part, to "[a]void locating a road on a slope greater than 67 percent, on an unstable slope, or in a slide-prone area, where feasible" [TLMP, p. 4-84]. The Selected Alternative includes two roads on slopes over 67 percent. The road cards for these roads, Roads 2180000-1 and 2180000-3, indicate that they have been located to avoid slopes over 67 percent where feasible. For the short segments where slopes are over 67 percent, they will be "full benched," meeting applicable BMP requirements [BMP 14.7]. In response to comments on this issue, the Forest Supervisor stated: Sections of roads on side slopes exceeding 67 percent are indicated on the road cards in Appendix 2 of the ROD. There are minimal areas of steep slope road construction on this project. Areas of road construction on steep side slopes will require full bench end haul of excavation as required in the BMPs. Temporary log stringer bridges will be used for drainage structures in all watersheds to eliminate any sediment caused by instream activity involved in culvert installations. Appeal Deciding Officer 42 [EIS, Appendix B, p. B-46]. In my opinion, the Cholmondeley project record indicates that road construction on slopes over 67 percent has been avoided to the extent feasible. For the two short road locations that were unavoidable, appropriate mitigation measures will be implemented. Issue 9. Whether the Cholmondeley EIS and ROD adequately discloses the recommendations identified in the watershed analysis conducted for the project. Appellants assert that the Selected Alternative includes timber harvest and road construction in the northern subbasin of Sunny Creek, which the watershed analysis stated presented the highest risk to fish habitat in the Creek. Appellants also assert that Alternative 5 constructs roads beyond the end point recommended in the watershed analysis for Saltery Creek, and that Alternative 6 is a feasible alternative that does propose road construction in this portion of the project area. Appellants further assert that the Selected Alternative includes timber harvest on the west side of Monie Lake and road construction that crosses important spawning habitat immediately upstream of the lake, against the recommendations in the watershed analysis report. Discussion As stated above, the Forest Supervisor has deferred a decision on the Saltery Cove portion of the project, so the issues related to the potential effects on the Saltery Cove watershed are not ripe for review at this time. With respect to Sunny Creek, appellants cite page 17 of the watershed analysis report for the Cholmondeley project, which states that "units and roads in the northern sub-basin present the highest risk to fish habitat in Sunny Creek." They also cite page 23 of the report, which states "the most sensitive area is the northern subwatershed ...timber harvest should avoid this area if possible." The appellants note that units 675-033 and 675-037, as well as Road 2170000-3, will be constructed in the northern sub-basin of this watershed. While this section of the report does identify concerns with timber harvest and road construction in the northern sub-basin of this watershed, it also states that stream buffers should be established in order to protect the stream channels and habitat and identifies recommended buffer widths. A fish biologist identified the buffer widths necessary to protect stream channels and habitats in both units, and this information is on the unit cards [ROD, Appendix 2, pp. A2-85, A2-88]. A log stringer bridge is encouraged for the road [ROD, Appendix 3, p. A3-15]. With respect to Monie Creek, appellants cite the recommendations that "ideally no road would be built to unit 275 as the access would cross fish streams below unit 012." The unit and road cards indicate that specialists were involved in stream buffer widths and stream crossing recommendations. In my opinion, the recommendations in the watershed analysis were adequately considered and disclosed in the Cholmondeley EIS and project record. To the extent feasible, these recommendations have been incorporated into the design of the harvest units and roads included in the Selected Alternative. Appeal Deciding Officer 43 Issue 10. Whether the timber sale procedures adopted by the Forest Service to respond to market demand and relied upon to justify the Cholmondeley project are consistent with TTRA. Appellants assert that the Forest Service's formula for estimating market demand inappropriately inflate the demand for Tongass timber, and that the Forest Service's estimate of Tongass timber consumption for FY 2003 is not based on current, accurate information. Appellants further assert that the Forest Supervisor's justification for the Selected Alternative is unreasonable. Discussion See my response to Issue 2 of the Sierra Club appeal, above, for a discussion of the process the Alaska Region uses to comply with Section 101 of the TTRA. As stated in that discussion, clearing a project through the NEPA process is an important step in the process the Alaska Region uses to comply with Section 101 of the TTRA; thus, the Forest Supervisor's conclusion that the Cholmondeley project is a necessary component of the Tongass timber program is reasonable. Issue 11. Whether the Forest Service adequately considered alternatives to the Clover Bay LTF that would minimize adverse effects on the marine environment. Appellants assert that the information in the EIS regarding the Clover Bay site is inaccurate, and that the Forest Service should have considered alternatives such as a temporary transfer facility that would load logs on barges as suggested by the U.S. Fish and Wildlife Service (FWS) and the Alaska Forest Association (AFA), and an alternative with an LTF at Island Point. Discussion See my response to Issue 4 of the Sierra Club appeal, above, for a complete discussion as to whether the information disclosed in the EIS with respect to Alternative 6, which proposed the use of the Island Point LTF site rather than Clover Bay, is adequate. In my opinion, the Cholmondeley EIS and project record indicate that the Forest Supervisor adequately considered the alternative LTF location at Island Point. Based on my review of the record, the Forest Supervisor's conclusion that "the Clover Bay site is the preferred option" is reasonable. The record also indicates that the Forest Supervisor considered additional alternatives to the Clover Bay LTF, including the helicopter harvest proposed in Alternatives 2 and 3 (see my response to Issue 2 of this appeal, above). The record also indicates that the Forest Supervisor considered the comments of the USFWS and AFA regarding the proposed use of a temporary barge transfer facility (see Issue 9 of the Sierra Club appeal, discussed above). In my opinion, the record indicates that the Forest Supervisor adequately considered alternatives to the Clover Bay LTF. Appeal Deciding Officer Issue 12. Whether the Cholmondeley project adequately protects karst resources. 44 Appellants assert that the Forest Service failed to follow TLMP direction regarding the inventory of karst resources within the project area, the delineation of karst hydrologic systems, and the assessment of vulnerability to management. Discussion The Forest-wide standards and guidelines for karst and cave resources require the identification of karst landscapes prior to project planning, and the delineation of these landscapes into high, moderate, and low vulnerability categories [TLMP, pp. 4-18 and 4-19]. The Cholmondeley EIS indicates that harvest units planned on top of or adjacent to carbonates were inventoried by the Forest geologist and soil scientist [EIS, p. 3-144]. The project record includes a "Geology, Minerals, and Karst Resources Report" and a "Cholmondeley DEIS, Karst Resource Report" for harvest units 674-032 and 675-032 [project record document # 57, #45]. These documents indicate that high vulnerability karst areas were identified and removed from timber harvest consideration, consistent with TLMP direction. The unit cards describe karst resource considerations. The unit card for harvest unit 674-032 states: The unit is predominately underlain by marble in which karst drainage systems have developed. Soils tend to be a mosaic of shallow organic and residual soils. No karst features were inventoried within the proposed unit boundary. If the inventory missed any karst features, the group selections should be designed to avoid these features as per the requirements of the Forest Plan Karst and Cave resource standards and guidelines. [ROD, Appendix 2, p. A2-55]. The unit card for harvest unit 675-032 states: The southernmost eight group selections and the clearcut are underlain by marble in which karst drainage systems have developed. Soils tend to be a mosaic of shallow organic and residual soils. Karst features (sinkholes taking small streams from upslope) and steep carbonate cliffs were identified along the geologic contact between the phyllite found above the unit and the marble. The group selections have been designed to avoid the karst features, losing streams, and cliff areas. [ROD, p. A2-82]. The karst resource report determined that the moderate and low vulnerability areas would be suitable for timber harvest, given the proposed partial cut prescriptions and partial suspension yarding requirements. No roads are planned within the karst areas. The 8.6 acres proposed for harvest in unit 674-032 and the 22.6 acres proposed for harvest in unit 675-032 are in moderate vulnerability karst areas. These acres will be harvested by helicopter, causing minimal soil disturbance. The unit cards indicate that the western half of these units will be partially harvested (40 to 50 percent). Appeal Deciding Officer 45 No dye traces in the proposed harvest units were conducted because there were no insurgences or resurgences found in the units. The Sitka Conservation Society submitted interested party comments, which include a report by the Tongass Cave Project. This report (dated after the ROD on July 10, 2003) includes information on a field visit to units 674-032 and 675-032. As stated above, these units are scheduled for helicopter harvest. The resurgences that were disclosed in the report are located outside and on the margins of the proposed timber sale units. In my opinion, the analysis of the karst resources for the Cholmondeley timber sale is appropriate, given the exclusion of high vulnerability lands from any unit and the mitigation required for the units within which timber harvest on moderate vulnerability karst will occur. Issue 13. Whether the Forest Service, in developing the Cholmondeley project, adequately minimized impacts to inventoried recreation places within the project area. Appellants assert that the EIS fails to disclose that Clover Bay has been identified as an inventoried recreation area important for tourism. Appellants also assert that the Forest Service failed to adequately consider alternatives that would have minimized effects on Clover Bay (Alternative 6). Discussion As the appellants correctly indicate, Clover Bay was identified as an inventoried recreation area in the forest planning process, and in the scheduling and location of project activities, TLMP states that land managers should "seek to minimize impacts to inventoried Recreation places" [TLMP, p. 3-148]. The TLMP also allocated the area north of the Bay to the timber production LUD, and these lands are to be managed for the production of saw timber and other wood products on an even-flow, long-term sustained yield basis [TLMP, p. 3-144; Cholmondeley EIS, p. 1-8]. The potential effects of the Cholmondeley project on the resources, residents, and visitors of Clover Bay was considered a significant issue in the EIS, and the EIS discusses these effects on pages 3-32 to 3-42. The EIS and ROD also discuss specific measures that are intended to help mitigate the effects on Clover Bay, including locating the operating area in a way that will create a screen of at least 60 to 75 feet ranging up to about 150 feet that will hide much of this development from the Bay; using a 60-foot vegetative buffer to screen the short road from the ramp to the operating area; moving the northern boundary of one unit to minimize visibility of the unit from the Bay; using a low angle ramp LTF style, which has the least visual impact; and implementing a mitigation measure that would limit activities near Clover Bay between June 1 and August 15 if possible [EIS, pp. 3-33 to 3-38; ROD, p. R-14]. In its discussion of the potential effects on recreation, the EIS states: Appeal Deciding Officer 46 The construction of a LTF and the development of a road system from this LTF could result in the introduction of motorized recreation use on this system. This could include the use of three or four-wheeled ATVs or, more likely, motorbikes. The use of these vehicles, however, would be significantly limited if culverts and bridges are pulled, roads put in storage as planned, and the LTFs restored, to some degree, to their natural condition.... Any motorized use as described above that was introduced in the vicinity of Clover Bay Lodge could be audible to clients staying at the lodge. Though this might be only periodic and infrequent, it would reduce the feeling of remoteness now experienced by the resort clients. [EIS, pp. 3-140 to 3-141]. The ROD also indicates that the Forest Supervisor considered the concerns of Clover Bay residents and other visitors: In response to visual concerns from Clover Bay, I am deleting a small portion along the northern edge of Unit 616-010 for scenery concerns... To respond to concerns expressed by local residents, other local users .... All roads that originate from Sunny Point LTF or Clover Bay LTF will be closed to all motorized traffic following salvage operations and silvicultural surveys. Salvage operations and silvicultural surveys will normally be completed within 5 years of timber harvest. Physical barriers will block the roads and a Code of Federal Regulation (CFR) closure order will prohibit access to these roads... Changes to the landscape, as seen from Clover Bay, would be slight except for the LTF, which would alter the recreation setting. Upland facilities would be somewhat screened by vegetation. [ROD, pp. R-4, R-15]. In my opinion, the analysis in the Cholmondeley EIS with respect to the potential effects on the resources, residents, and visitors of Clover Bay is adequate, and demonstrates that the Forest Supervisor made a reasonable effort to minimize the effects on the Bay. Issue 14. Whether the Cholmondeley EIS adequately analyzes the project's potential effects on water quality, and whether the project is consistent with the State's water quality and drinking water standards. Appellants assert that the Forest Service's reliance on BMPs and monitoring to comply with the State's water quality standard for turbidity in Sunny Cove does not comply with NEPA or TLMP. Appellants also assert that the EIS fails to support a conclusion that water quality in Saltery Cove and Clover Bay, which are Class B public water systems, will be maintained consistent with the State's water quality and drinking water standards, and that activities "which are likely to pollute a known public water system" have been avoided. Appeal Deciding Officer Discussion 47 See my response to Issue 2 of the Earthjustice appeal, above, for a complete discussion as to whether the Cholmondeley project is consistent with the State's water quality and drinking water standards. Based on the analysis in the EIS and project record, the Forest Supervisor concluded that with the implementation of BMPs and other water quality standards and guidelines, the Selected Alternative would not have any measurable effects on water quality. Additional mitigation measures to address water quality issues in domestic water watersheds are listed on pages 6 and 7 of the ROD. In my opinion, there is sufficient information in the Cholmondeley EIS and project record to support the Forest Supervisor's conclusion that the project will not result in violations of the State's turbidity and drinking water standard. Issue 15. Whether the Forest Supervisor's rationale for not selecting Alternative 7, the Interagency Team's recommended OGRs, is reasonable and consistent with TLMP. Appellants assert that the standards and guidelines provided in TLMP take precedence over any output objective such as a level of timber harvest, and that the Forest Supervisor was required to ensure that the Cholmondeley project fully complies with the standards and guidelines for OGRs and with the criteria for the design of such reserves. Appellants also assert that the Forest Supervisor's statement that the Selected Alternative responds in part to the Team's recommendations is misleading, as virtually none of their recommendations were incorporated into the decision. Appellants further assert that the Forest Service should have included all lands in calculating the mapped reserves, rather than just NFS lands. Discussion See my response to Issue 6 of the Sierra Club appeal, above, for a complete discussion as to whether the Forest Supervisor adequately considered the recommendations of the Interagency Team with respect to the OGRs in the project area and whether his decision to adopt the IDT's recommended OGRs is consistent with TLMP. Appendix K clearly states that its criteria "serve as guidelines for further evaluating the design of reserves at the project level" [EIS, Appendix K, p. K-1]. The Forest Plan indicates that "guidelines" are not absolute requirements, but ways of achieving the standards or meeting other needs of the resource" [TLMP, p. 1-4]. Appendix K requires that these site-specific factors be considered in adjusting OGR boundaries, but it does not require that these factors override other multiple use objectives. The 1998 TPIT Clarification Papers make authority on the location of small reserves p. 1]. Based on the guidance provided by decision to adopt the IDT's modifications Forest Plan. it clear that "[t]he line officer retains project decision within the project area" [TPIT Clarification Papers, the TPIT Clarification Papers, the Forest Supervisor's was within his authority and not inconsistent with the Appeal Deciding Officer Appeal No. 03-10-00-0010, Sitka Conservation Society: 48 Issue 1. Whether the Forest Service adequately responded to public comments on the Draft EIS for the Cholmondeley project. Appellants assert that the Forest Service failed to adequately consider their comments on the Draft EIS, that it failed to attach the substantive comments or summaries thereof to the Final EIS, and that it ignored their requests for additional maps and/or features on maps that were in the Draft EIS. Discussion See my response to Issue 9 of the Sierra Club appeal for a complete discussion as to whether the Forest Service adequately responded to public comments on the Draft EIS for the Cholmondeley project. Based on my review of the record and Appendix B of the EIS, public comments on the Draft EIS were appropriately reviewed and considered. Summaries of these comments and the Forest Service response to these comments are included in Appendix B. Copies of all comments from Federal, State, and local agencies and elected officials are also included in this appendix, consistent with Forest Service policy. With respect to appellants' assertion that the Forest Service ignored their requests for additional maps and/or features on maps, the record indicates that several maps were added or modified in the Final EIS. For example, an Existing Condition Map was added to the Final EIS [Figure 2-1], and the OGR locations were added to the alternative maps. Appellants' comments on the Draft EIS acknowledge that the Forest Service provided another map they requested directly to them [decision document #43, p. 2]. The other maps appellants asserted should be added to the EIS were either already in the EIS, available in the project record, or deemed not necessary for the analysis in the EIS. Issue 2. Whether the Forest Service should have prepared a Supplemental Draft EIS for the Cholmondeley project. Appellants assert that the Forest Service should have prepared a Supplemental Draft EIS to address the new information presented in the Final EIS, particularly information regarding timber harvest and the existing environment in terms of volume class, issues related to the cedar component of the project, and information relating to the OGRs in the project area. Appellants further assert that a Supplemental EIS should have been prepared to allow the public to comment on Alternative 6, and that important information relating to this alternative is not fairly presented. Discussion See my response to Issue 10 of the Sierra Club appeal for a complete discussion as to whether the Forest Service should have prepared a Supplemental Draft EIS for the Cholmondeley project. Based on my review of the record, the information in the EIS and project record provided the Forest Supervisor with sufficient information upon which to base his decision, and a Supplemental Draft EIS was not necessary. Appeal Deciding Officer 49 With regards to whether the EIS contained accurate information relating to the volume class of the harvest units and the cedar component of the Cholmondeley project, see my response to Issues 1 and 5 of the Sierra Club appeal, above, for a complete discussion of these issues. Based on my review of the record, the volume class and volume strata information included in the EIS is accurate. Issue 3. Whether the purpose and need for the Cholmondeley project is valid. Appellants assert that the Forest Service has not implemented the "consistent with providing for other resources" provision in TTRA. Appellants also assert that the necessity of the Cholmondeley project as a component of the timber program has not been demonstrated in the EIS or ROD, and that there is no evidence to support the Forest Service's assumption that the market for Tongass timber may recover within a fairly short timeframe and that timber must be available in the pipeline to respond to such a market. Discussion In large part, appellants' assertions regarding the Forest Service's analysis of market demand and its reliance on the TTRA market demand provisions for the purpose and need for the Cholmondeley sale are outside the scope of a project level EIS. See my response to Issue 2 of the Sierra Club appeal, above, for a discussion of the process the Alaska Region uses to comply with Section 101 of the TTRA. As stated in that discussion, clearing a project through the NEPA process is an important step in the process the Alaska Region uses to comply with Section 101 of the TTRA; thus, the Forest Supervisor's conclusion that the Cholmondeley project is a necessary component of the Tongass timber program is reasonable. Issue 4. Whether the socioeconomic analysis conducted for the Cholmondeley EIS is adequate. Appellants assert that the Cholmondeley EIS does not adequately analyze the benefits that the Sportman's Cove and Clover Bay Lodges provide to the greater Southeast Alaska community, or the financial harm that the lodges and the community will endure as a result of the proposed timber harvest. Discussion As stated in the ROD, the Forest Supervisor has deferred a decision on the Saltery Cove portion of the Cholmondeley project while he continues to work with other agencies and residents towards resolving potential conflicts (ROD, p. R-4). Thus, whether or not the EIS adequately analyzed the potential effects on lodge owners in Saltery Cove is not ripe for review at this time. See my response to Issue 3 of the Sierra Club appeal, adequacy of the EIS's analysis of the potential effects Clover Bay. In my opinion, the EIS did consider and Cholmondeley project alternatives on the Clover Bay above, for a complete discussion of the on the resources, residents, and visitors of disclose the potential effects of the Lodge. While these effects may not have Appeal Deciding Officer been quantified to the extent appellants assert they should have been, the indicate that the Forest Supervisor did consider the annual income of the estimated effects on the workforce associated with the Lodge, along with effects on the clientele of the Lodge and the resources of Clover Bay. In analysis in the Cholmondeley EIS with respect to the potential effects on and visitors of Clover Bay is adequate. 50 EIS and project record Lodge and the the other potential my opinion, the the resources, residents, Issue 5. Whether the Forest Service has adequately analyzed and considered the high cedar component of the Cholmondeley project. Appellants assert cedar and that the species diversity. cedar component Discussion See my response to Issue 1 of the Sierra Club appeal, above, for a discussion as to whether the EIS adequately analyzed and considered the high cedar component of the Cholmondeley project. Based on the pre-sale preparation for cedar reserve trees and the post-treatment activities planned for the Cholmondeley harvest units, the cedar component of the project area is expected to be maintained and the timber harvest authorized in the ROD should have no adverse effect on the quantity or composition of cedar in the future. In my opinion, the analysis in the EIS with respect to this issue is adequate. While the employment estimates provided in the EIS and ROD do not account for the cedar component of the sale that may be exported, and while the ROD includes inaccurate information on the estimated employment resulting from the harvest volume authorized in the Selected Alternative, these adjustments do not affect the relative ranking of the alternatives the Forest Supervisor considered. Therefore, in my opinion these changes would probably not have led to the selection of a different alternative or otherwise affected the Forest Supervisor's decision. Issue 6. Whether the Cholmondeley EIS fully discloses the amount of timber harvest in high volume old growth in the project area. Appellants assert that the EIS does not fully disclose the impacts of the proposed timber harvest on high volume old growth stands, and that it should have included further information on the types and habitat quality of the stands harvested compared to what will remain after harvest in the project area. Discussion See my response to Issue 5 of the Sierra Club appeal, above, for a discussion as to whether the EIS fully disclosed the amount of timber harvest in high volume old growth in the project area. Based on my review of the record, the volume class and volume strata information in the EIS is accurate. that the Forest Service is highgrading through the disproportionate harvest of Cholmondeley EIS failed to analyze the effects of the cedar harvest on forest Appellants also assert that the Forest Service has failed to account for the of the project in its economic analysis and job calculations. Appeal Deciding Officer Issue 7. Whether the Forest Supervisor should have adopted the Interagency Team's recommendations for OGRs in the project area. 51 Appellants also assert that the Forest Service did not follow a fair process in communicating and working with the interagency biologists, that important information from the Interagency Team is absent in the Cholmondeley EIS, and that the Forest Service has not complied with NEPA and with TLMP in that it did not provide their recommendations to the public and present an alternative responsive to their recommendations in the Draft EIS, and did not disclose the statements, comments, and views of the interagency biologists in the Final EIS. Appellants further assert that the OGRs adopted in the ROD do not meet TLMP Appendix K criteria, and that the Forest Service should have considered the cumulative effects of harvest and development of all of the lands within the project area rather than just NFS lands. Appellants also assert that the EIS presents inaccurate information on the amount of POG included in Alternative 7. Finally, appellants assert that the Forest Supervisor ignored the concerns of its own experts and those of other agencies, and that his decision to adopt the IDT's OGR design rather than the Interagency Team's design is arbitrary and capricious. Discussion See my response to Issue 6 of the Sierra Club appeal, above, for a complete discussion of the OGRs considered for the project area and whether the Forest Supervisor's decision to adopt the IDT's OGR adjustments is consistent with TLMP. Based on the guidance provided by the TPIT Clarification Papers, the Forest Supervisor's decision to adopt the OGRs developed by the IDT rather than the Interagency Team's recommended OGRs was within his authority and not inconsistent with the Forest Plan. Issue 8. Whether the discussion of OGRs in the Cholmondeley EIS meets the requirements of NEPA. Appellants assert that the design of the OGRs should have been considered a significant issue for the NEPA analysis, and that the information in the EIS relating to OGRs is inaccurate and insufficient to determine the ability of the proposed reserves to protect wildlife viability and maintain the integrity of the Forest-wide conservation strategy. Appellants further assert that the statement in the EIS that Alternative 7's medium OGR does not meet the minimum 2,500 acres of high volume old growth recommended in the Forest Plan is inaccurate and misleading. Appellants also assert that the Forest Service should have included a discussion of OGRs in Chapter 2 of the EIS. Discussion See my response to Issue 6 of the Sierra Club appeal for a complete discussion of the process the Forest Supervisor followed in making the adjustments to the OGRs included in the Selected Alternative for the Cholmondeley project. Appeal Deciding Officer 52 Appellants assert that the design of the OGRs should have been considered a significant issue for the NEPA analysis and discussed in the comparison of the alternatives provided in Chapter 2. I disagree. The regulations implementing NEPA at 40 CFR 1501.7 state that "[t]here shall be an early and open process for determining the scope of issues to be addressed and for identifying the significant issues related to a proposed action." As part of this scoping process the lead agency shall "[d]etermine the scope (1508.25) and the significant issues to be analyzed in depth in the [EIS]" [40 CFR 1501.7(a)(2)]. While the NOI identified "old growth ecosystem management" as a tentative issue identified for analysis, there is no indication that significant concerns regarding the design of the OGRs were raised during scoping for the project. In fact, appellants do not point to any specific comments or concerns relating to OGRs except for IDT meeting notes in March 2001 and a review of the draft Final EIS in June 2002, four to five years after scoping for the project was initiated. The Forest Service is not required to go back and identify additional significant issues in response to public and/or agency concerns that arise later in the project planning process. Appellants also assert that Chapter 2 of the EIS should have included a discussion of OGRs. I assume appellants mean that the differences between the OGRs in each alternative should have been addressed in a comparative fashion. As discussed above, OGR design was not identified as a significant issue during scoping for the project. In order to better reflect the Interagency Team recommendations for the OGRs, Alternative 7 was developed. This alternative was included and discussed in Chapter 2 of the EIS. The differences between the OGRs developed by the IDT and the OGRs recommended by the Interagency Team are discussed in Chapter 3 of the EIS and in other documents in the project record. In my opinion, the record indicates that the Forest Supervisor considered the alternatives developed for the project, including Alternative 7, and that the information in the EIS and project record was sufficient for him to make a reasoned choice among those alternatives. Issue 9. Whether the Cholmondeley project is consistent with TLMP with its proposed road through the OGR and estuary buffer. Discussion The Forest-wide standards and guidelines for beach and estuary fringes are listed on pages 4-4 to 4-5 of TLMP, and state that "[r]oad construction is discouraged in the beach and estuary fringes. Where feasible alternatives are not available, road corridors may be designated" [TLMP, p. 4-5]. The management prescriptions for the Old Growth Habitat LUD state that "[n]ew road construction is generally inconsistent with Old Growth Habitat [LUD] objectives, but new roads may be constructed if no feasible alternative is available" [TLMP, p. 3-81]. Chapter 2 of the EIS describes the alternatives that were considered for the Cholmondeley project, including Alternatives 2 and 3, which proposed that some or all of the harvest units would be helicopter yarded, and Alternative 6, which proposed the use of the Island Point LTF site verses the LTF at Clover Bay. Chapter 3 of the EIS discusses the potential effects of these alternatives, and discloses the results of the estimated economic efficiency analyses conducted Appeal Deciding Officer 53 for the alternatives. As stated in the ROD, the results of these analyses indicated that Alternatives 2 and 3 were economically infeasible [ROD, pp. R-22 to R-23; see also Table 3-9 in the EIS, p. 3-59]. The Forest Supervisor also decided not to select Alternative 6, stating: I decided not to select Alternative 6 because it would also be deficit in most market conditions. The extreme high cost of the Island Point LTF, its increased upland impacts of the larger sort yard, and more dangerous exposure make it a less desirable site. The additional road required and increased effects to riparian habitat make the Clover Bay LTF the preferred option. [ROD, p. R-24]. See my response to Issue 4 of the Sierra Club appeal, above, for further discussion of the analysis of the costs of Alternative 6. In my opinion, the Forest Supervisor adequately considered alternatives to the road construction in the beach fringe, as required by TLMP, and concluded that these alternatives were not feasible. Based on my review of the record, his conclusion is reasonable. Issue 10. Whether the Cholmondeley project is consistent with Forest Service regulations implementing NFMA requiring the protection of biodiversity. Appellants assert that the Cholmondeley project cannot tier to and rely on the habitat conservation strategy in TLMP when it fails to implement that strategy. Appellants also assert that the Forest Service should be operating under the 2000 planning regulations rather than the 1982 planning regulations. Discussion In large part, appellants are raising forest planning issues that are outside the scope of a project level EIS. Forest Service regulations at 36 CFR 219.19 require that fish and wildlife habitat be managed to maintain viable populations of existing native and desired non-native vertebrate species in the planning area. These regulations apply to the development, adoption, and revision of forest land and resource management plans; they do not apply to project level decisions. The administrative record for the TLMP demonstrates that the old growth habitat reserve strategy provides for viable populations of all old growth associated species, and the Under Secretary of Agriculture's decisions on the appeals of the TLMP ROD and FEIS determined that the Regional Forester's decision was consistent with the National Forest Management Act (NFMA). Forest Plan monitoring and evaluation and the 5-year review of the Forest Plan required by NFMA provide opportunities to evaluate the effectiveness of TLMP standards and guidelines and to recommend amendments as necessary. At this time, there is no reason to question the effectiveness of the standards and guidelines provided in TLMP, nor the adequacy of the overall old growth habitat reserve strategy. With regards to the Cholmondeley project area specifically, the Cholmondeley project is appropriately tiered to the comprehensive landscape old growth habitat reserve strategy that was designed for the TLMP. This strategy was developed with consideration of the cumulative effects of a full 100-year implementation of the Forest Plan. This includes the effects of the Appeal Deciding Officer 54 proposed Cholmondeley timber sale and all other potential sales within the Tongass National Forest. Any project that tiers to and fully implements the land allocations and standards and guidelines in TLMP will by definition maintain viable populations of old growth associated species. Based on my review of the Cholmondeley EIS, the project appears to be consistent with the standards and guidelines provided in TLMP for the protection of old growth associated wildlife species; therefore, species viability and biodiversity has been fully and appropriately addressed. With regards to whether the Forest Service should be operating under the 2000 planning regulations rather than the 1982 planning regulations, that issue is outside the scope of a project level EIS. The Department of Agriculture is currently reviewing the revised planning regulations; until those regulations are made final, the Forest Service is not obligated to implement them. Issue 11. Whether the Forest Service adequately considered the project's effect on wildlife and wildlife habitat. Appellants assert that the Cholmondeley EIS does not adequately analyze fragmentation and its effect on wildlife. Appellants further assert that the analysis in the Cholmondeley EIS with respect to the Queen Charlotte goshawk, the American marten, deer, wolves, and wildlife corridors is inadequate. Discussion The potential effects of the Cholmondeley project on wildlife, wildlife habitat, and OGRs are discussed on pages 3-89 to 3-113, and there is additional documentation in the wildlife resource report and biological evaluation completed for the project [Appendix D to the EIS]. With regards to appellants' assertions regarding fragmentation, the EIS does not indicate that habitat fragmentation was identified as a significant issue to be addressed in the planning process. Nevertheless, the EIS devotes several pages [pp. 3-91 through 3-93] to discussing the potential fragmentation effects for each alternative and displaying the numbers of patches by size class and average size. As disclosed in the EIS, fragmentation tends to isolate old growth dependent species and is generally considered detrimental to species that require old growth forest habitat for survival and reproduction [EIS, p. 3-93]. Appellants' concerns regarding habitat fragmentation relate to their overall concerns regarding the TLMP old growth habitat reserve strategy, discussed above. Maintaining large, unfragmented blocks of old growth forest was one objective of this strategy. This strategy includes all non-development LUDs, such as beach, estuary, and riparian buffers, plus a mosaic of small, medium, and large OGRs. This overall landscape conservation strategy seeks to ensure that connectivity between and wildlife values within these reserves are maintained. As part of the Cholmondeley project, the Forest Supervisor modified the boundaries of two small OGRs and one medium OGR to better address TLMP objectives for the OGRs. The Cholmondeley project is consistent with the TLMP old growth habitat reserve strategy. Appeal Deciding Officer 55 With regards to appellants' assertions relating to marten, the EIS discusses the potential effects of the project on marten on pages 3-107 to 3-108, and on page 3-117. As indicated in the EIS, the Cholmondeley project area is within a high-risk biogeographic province (Central Prince of Wales) because of the logging and road building activity that has occurred in other areas of the province [EIS, p. 3-107]. For high-risk provinces where less than 33 percent of the original forest has been harvested, the Forest Plan indicates that vegetation management applied to high value marten habitat (stands below 1500 feet elevation in high volume POG strata as identified in the latest Interagency Marten Habitat Capability Model) that creates openings over two acres in size should use silvicultural methods to meet the marten objective. Within the harvest unit, the following forest stand characteristics should be met after harvest: 1) 2) 3) 4) Retain approximately 10-20 percent of the original stand structure. Retain an average of four large trees per acre for snag recruitment. Retain an average of three large decadent trees per acre. Retain an average of at least three pieces of down material per acre, generally distributed throughout the harvest unit. 5) Retained trees should have a reasonable assurance of windfirmness. 6) Consider adding smaller or younger trees for future structure recruitment and to improve windfirmness. [TLMP, p. 4-119; see also Cholmondeley EIS, p. 3-107]. Appellants question the 1991 reference to patch size (180 acres) in the EIS, and I agree that this statement could have been qualified to state that this was an unverified hypothesis. However, the marten model used for the analysis in the EIS is accepted and was used to display relative marten habitat capabilities between the Cholmondeley alternatives. Based on this analysis, the EIS predicted that marten habitat capability would decline by about 2 percent under Alternatives 4 and 7, and by about 5 percent under Alternatives 2, 3, 5, and 6 [EIS, p. 3-107]. The unit cards for the harvest units included in the Selected Alternative indicate that the marten standards are being applied as prescribed by the wildlife recommendations. For example, the unit card for unit 674-548 (pointed out by appellants) indicates that 2.1 to 4.2 acres will be retained in the southern portion of the unit to meet marten habitat requirements and specifies the harvest method to be used (overstory removal) and the amount and type of leave trees. The unit card for unit 674-551 (also pointed out by appellants) indicates that a 100-foot wide stream buffer would provide marten habitat. This is consistent with TLMP standards and guidelines which state that land allocations such as riparian buffers may be assumed to be high value marten habitat [TLMP, p. 4-119]. This is further reiterated in the 1998 TPIT Clarification Papers regarding areas contributing to marten and goshawk habitat and the standards and guidelines for forest structure requirements. With regards to appellants' assertions relating to wolves, the EIS discusses the potential effects of the project on wolves [EIS, pp. 3-106 to 3-107]. The discussion is brief, but describes the anticipated changes in deer habitat capability by wildlife analysis area (WAA), changes which are mirrored by habitat capability for wolves, their major natural predator. Table 3-34 [located on page 106] indicates that deer habitat capability for two WAAs is expected to remain above the minimum sufficient to meet wolf and human demands (as described in TLMP and clarified in the Appeal Deciding Officer 56 1998 TPIT report). Habitat capability in the third WAA is already below the minimum due to previous and on-going habitat alteration in other areas of this WAA. The Cholmondeley project does not include timber harvest in this WAA [EIS, p. 3-106]. The Alexander Archipelago wolf was not discussed in the Biological Assessment in Appendix D because it is not a federally listed species, nor is it on the Regional sensitive species list. With regards to appellants' assertions relating to wildlife corridors, the 1998 TPIT Clarification Papers state that "there is no requirement to ensure connectivity among all small reserves or between small reserves and non-development LUDs including large and medium reserves." The proposed OGRs in the Cholmondeley project area appear to adequately allow for landscape connectivity. The Monie Lake small OGR, as designed by the IDT, included a narrow strip (250 feet) south of the lake. As stated in the ROD: To respond to concerns for a wide enough wildlife travel corridor, I have dropped the northern portion of Units 616-012 and 616-011... in order to create a 600-foot buffer between the lake and the units. [ROD page R-4]. In addition, this OGR is connected to the medium OGR and the Spiral Cove small OGR by the 1,000-foot beach buffers. The reserve in VCU 614 does not appear to be explicitly connected to another by beach buffers or mapping design; however, as stated above, connectivity is not required. With regards to appellants' assertions relating to the deer model, it appears that the EIS did use the deer habitat capability model to estimate relative differences in habitat capability for each alternative. This is inferred from the statement on page 3-106, which states: The current estimated deer population (run with predation and at 125 deer per square mile) for the Chomondeley project area is 1,052. Alternatives 2, 3 and 5 result in a decline to 1,024 (down 3%) (emphasis in original). The Cholmondeley EIS discloses the predicted habitat capability differences between alternatives on page 3-106. As no adjustments to the model for this project are described, it appears that the standard deer model was used to estimate the potential effects on deer habitat capability. With regards to appellants' assertions relating to goshawks, see Issue 7 of the Sierra Club appeal, above, for a discussion of the goshawk surveys conducted for the Cholmondeley project and the adequacy of the EIS's analysis of the potential effects of the project on goshawks. In my opinion, the analysis in the Cholmondeley EIS with respect to the potential effects on wildlife is adequate. Appeal Deciding Officer 57 Issue 12. Whether the Cholmondeley EIS adequately addresses fish habitat, harvest and road construction on steep slopes, and harvest and road construction on karst. Discussion See my response to Issue 7 of the SEACC appeal, above, for a discussion as to whether the proposed logging on slopes greater than 72 percent is consistent with TLMP, and my response to Issue 12 of the SEACC appeal for a discussion of the potential effects on karst resources within the project area. In my opinion, the analysis in the EIS and project record with respect to these issues is adequate, and the project is consistent with the Forest Plan. The Cholmondeley EIS and supporting documents in the project record evaluate the relationships between headwater streams (Class III and Class IV), timber harvest, road development, landslides, water quality and quantity, domestic water supply, and fish habitat. Relevant discussion begins on page 3-118 of the EIS with the "watersheds" discussion and continues through the "Essential Fish Habitat" discussion on 3-139. Additional information is located in the "Addendum to the Floodplains, Soils, and Wetlands Resources Report for the Cholmondeley Project Area" [decision document #52], the scientific studies of landslides referenced on page 3-121 of the EIS, Forest Service Handbook 2090.21 � Aquatic Habitat Management Handbook [referenced on page 3-125 of the EIS], and the watershed analysis for the Cholmondeley project area. Appellants refer to the "PACFISH Strategy," which they acknowledge was barred from implementation in Alaska by congressional mandate. As discussed above in response to Issue 12 of the SEACC appeal, karst resources were identified in harvest units 674-032 and 675-032; as those units will be helicopter yarded and will not include road construction, any effects on karst resources is expected to be minimal. In my opinion, the analysis in the EIS adequately addresses fish habitat, harvest and road construction on steep slopes, and harvest and road construction on karst. Issue 13. Whether the field surveys conducted for sensitive plants along roads were adequate. Discussion The Biological Assessment and Biological Evaluation (BA/BE) for Threatened, Endangered and Sensitive Species (EIS, Appendix D, pages D-19 to D36) identified sensitive plant and animal species that could potentially occur in or near the Cholmondeley project area. Field assessments conducted in 1997 surveyed 11 of 46 proposed harvest units and 3.75 miles of the 33.44 miles of proposed road [EIS, p. D-21]. As indicated in the EIS, road surveys were not completed on all roads as road locations were not flagged at the time of the surveys [Id.]. Table 2 on page D-20 of the BA/BE lists the findings of the BE/BA for eleven sensitive plant species that might occur in the Cholmondeley Project Area. As disclosed in the BA/BE, the analysis of the potential effects of the proposed activities resulted in the following findings: no Appeal Deciding Officer 58 effect on six species; may affect individuals, not likely to adversely affect population viability for two species; would not likely to adversely affect one species; and two species were removed from the Sensitive Species list after the plant surveys were conducted. The Forest Plan establishes standards and guidelines for conducting BEs, stating: The need for and extent of field surveys to develop a [BE] should be considered in relation to the possible risks associated with the project, the species involved, and the level of knowledge already on hand. The intensity and scope of inventories should be commensurate with the potential risk of a proposed project on sensitive species. [TLMP, p. 4-89]. The "Inventory Protocol for Sensitive and Rare Plants for the Ketchikan area" is a local guide to assist biologists in conducting BEs for sensitive plants. As stated in the February 1998 version of this protocol, sensitive plant surveys can be conducted before or after final unit or road layout In my opinion, adequate plant surveys were conducted in the units to support the determinations in the BA/BE. The proposed units would not likely result in a trend towards Federal listing or loss of viability for sensitive plant species. Additional sensitive plant surveys may be conducted during road layout if necessary. If sensitive plants are located during road surveys, appropriate mitigation measures will be implemented. Issue 14. Whether the Cholmondeley EIS demonstrates that the Pacific yew tree will be adequately protected as required by the Pacific Yew Tree Act of 1992. Discussion The Pacific Yew Tree Act of 1992 states that the Secretary of Agriculture shall pursue a conservation and management policy to "provide for the long-term conservation of the Pacific yew in the wild" [Sec. 3(2) of the Act]. Most occurrences of Pacific yew in its Alaskan range are within 500 feet of the beach; thus, TLMP provides for conservation of the Pacific yew through the 1,000-foot beach buffer. The few yew trees in the Cholmondeley project area that might be more than 1,000 feet from the beach are in areas unlikely to be logged because Pacific yew grows in poorly drained areas, which support forests of marginal timber value. Additionally, as Pacific yew surveys estimated that there might be six trees per mile of shoreline; the likelihood that a tree might be damaged by yarding is extremely low [EIS, pp. 3-88 to 3-89]. In my opinion, the analysis of the potential effects of the Cholmondeley project on the Pacific yew is adequate, and sufficient to support the conclusion that this species will be adequately protected. Issue 15. Whether the Forest Service adequately analyzed the project's effects on roadless areas. Appellants assert that both the TLMP Supplemental EIS and the Cholmondeley EIS fail to adequately analyze the effects on the McKenzie Roadless Area, including the effects on the roadless character and wilderness values of the area. Appeal Deciding Officer Discussion 59 In large part, appellants are arguing forest planning issues that are outside the scope of this project level EIS. In compliance with Forest Service regulations, policy, and procedures, the potential wilderness values of roadless areas throughout the Tongass National Forest were thoroughly inventoried and evaluated at the forest planning level, as discussed in the TLMP SEIS [February 2003]. See my response to Issue 6 of the Earthjustice appeal, above, for a discussion as to whether the Cholmondeley EIS adequately evaluated the project's potential effects on the McKenzie Roadless Area. In my opinion, the Forest Supervisor adequately considered the potential effects of the Cholmondeley project alternatives on the McKenzie Inventoried Roadless Area. The EIS and ROD indicate that the area will remain eligible for future consideration as wilderness. Issue 16. Whether the Selected Alternative violates Executive Order 11990. Appellants assert that the Cholmondeley EIS did not adequately analyze and disclose the potential effects on wetlands in the project area, and that the Forest Service failed to consider alternatives that would have avoided effects on wetlands. Discussion Executive Order 11990 states, in part: Each Agency, to the extent permitted by law, shall avoid undertaking or providing assistance for new construction located in wetlands unless the head of the agency finds (1) that there is no practicable alternative to such construction, and (2) that the proposed action includes all practicable measures to minimize harm to wetlands which may result from such use. In making this finding, the head of the agency may take into account economic, environmental, and other pertinent factors. [EO 11990, Section 2(a)]. Appellants believe that the Forest Service violated EO 11990 by selecting an alternative that does not avoid as many wetland acres as the other alternatives considered. The EIS discusses the potential effects of the Cholmondeley project on wetlands on pages 3-128 to 3-125, and the record demonstrates that wetlands have been avoided to the extent feasible. Where roads are located on wetlands, it is primarily due to safety, engineering design, and other resource concerns. The Forest Service is not required to select the alternative with the least amount of effects on wetlands; rather, it is required to avoid wetlands to the extent feasible. In my opinion, the Cholmondeley EIS adequately analyzed the potential effect of the proposed timber harvest on wetlands, and the road and unit cards demonstrate that wetlands have been avoided to the extent feasible. Issue 17. Whether the "Environment and Effects" section of the Cholmondeley EIS is adequate. Appellants assert that this section of the EIS is inadequate, particularly with respect to the discussions related to wildlife effects and OGRs. Appeal Deciding Officer Discussion 60 Appellants raise a general assertion that the discussion of the Cholmondeley project's potential effects on wildlife is inadequate and that OGRs are not fully discussed in the EIS. Appellants' specific concerns with respect to wildlife and the OGRs developed for the Cholmondeley project have been discussed previously in this recommendation. Based on my review of the EIS and project record, the analysis in the record with respect to these issues is adequate. Recommendation In my opinion, the analysis in the EIS and project record is sufficient to support the Forest Supervisor's decision with respect to the issues raised in these appeals. Therefore, I recommend that you affirm the Forest Supervisor's decision. /s/ Cherie Shelley CHERIE SHELLEY Appeal Reviewing Officer Enclosures